Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1200.
hereby enacts as follows:CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Cannabis Health and Safety Act.Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advertising." To engage in marketing and promotional 20250HB1200PN1641 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 activities, including, but not limited to, billboard, newspaper, radio, Internet and electronic media, social media and television advertising, the distribution of fliers and circulars and the display of window and interior signs."Affiliate" or "affiliated." A person that, directly or indirectly, through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled by or is under common control with a specified person."Applicant." The following apply:(1) An individual who is a citizen of the United States or an individual lawfully admitted for permanent residency in the United States, who is 21 years of age or older and who is applying for a license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act.(2) In the case of an applicant that is a person other than an individual, the affiliated persons whose qualifications may be subject to review and approval by the board as a precondition to authorizing the person to engage in a regulated activity."Background investigation." A security, criminal, financial, credit and suitability investigation of an applicant. The term shall include an investigation into the status of taxes owed to the United States, the Commonwealth and any political subdivision of the Commonwealth."Board." The Liquor Control Board established under the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code."Bona fide labor organization." A labor organization, as defined by 29 U.S.C. § 402(i) (relating to definitions), that the board has determined under section 403(b)(36) is a bona fide labor organization.20250HB1200PN1641 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Cannabis." As follows:(1) Any of the following:(i) Marijuana, hashish and other substances that are identified as including any parts of the cannabis plant and derivatives or subspecies of all strains of cannabis, whether growing or not, including the seeds, the resin extracted from any part of the plant and any compound, manufacture, salt, derivative or mixture or preparation of the plant, seeds or resin.(ii) THC and all other naturally or synthetically produced cannabinol derivatives, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction.(iii) Processed hemp.(2) The term does not include:(i) The mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant or any other compound, salt, derivative, mixture, the sterilized seed of the plant that is incapable of germination or industrial hemp.(ii) Medical marijuana as defined by the act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act."Cannabis arrest." As defined in section 301."Cannabis concentrate." A product derived from cannabis that is produced by extracting cannabinoids, including THC, hashish and resin, from the plant through the use of solvents, carbon dioxide, heat, screens, presses or steam distillation or other methods expressly designated by the board."Cannabis consumer." An individual 21 years of age or older who possesses a personal amount of cannabis purchased from a 20250HB1200PN1641 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabis store."Cannabis conviction." As defined in section 301."Cannabis cultivator." A person licensed by the board under section 707 to cultivate cannabis in this Commonwealth as a Category 1 cannabis cultivator or a Category 2 microcultivator."Cannabis entity."(1) A cannabis cultivator.(2) A cannabis processor.(3) A cannabis microbusiness.(4) A cannabis transporter.(5) An on-site consumption licensee."Cannabis establishment." The physical location specified in an application of a cannabis entity licensee and where the licensee has been granted authorization to cultivate, process, transport or sell cannabis, cannabis flower or cannabis products as provided under this act and regulations of the board. The term includes:(1) Public and private areas of the cannabis establishment.(2) The entire lot or parcel that a cannabis cultivator owns, leases or has a right to occupy."Cannabis flower." The flower of a cannabis plant. The term does not include cannabis trim."Cannabis flowering stage." The stage of cultivation when a cannabis plant is cultivated to produce cannabis flower and plant material for a cannabis product. The term includes mature plants if any of the following apply:(1) More than two stigmas are visible at each internode of the plant.(2) The cannabis plant is in an area that has been 20250HB1200PN1641 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intentionally deprived of light for a period of time intended to produce flower buds and induce maturation, from the moment the light deprivation began through the remainder of the cannabis plant growth cycle."Cannabis grow canopy." The area of a cannabis establishment of a cannabis cultivator that is dedicated to live cannabis plant cultivation. The term does not include areas of a the cannabis establishment of a cannabis cultivator that is used for storage of fertilizers, pesticides, herbicides or other products, tools or equipment used in the cultivation of cannabis, quarantine areas, office space, walkways, work areas or similar areas not dedicated to live cannabis plant cultivation."Cannabis microbusiness." A person licensed as a Category 2 cannabis microcultivator under section 707 or a Category 2 cannabis microprocessor under section 708."Cannabis offense." As defined in section 301."Cannabis paraphernalia." Any device or material which is used, intended for use or designed for use for ingesting, inhaling or otherwise introducing cannabis flower or cannabis products into the human body."Cannabis paraphernalia permittee." A person permitted by the board to display, offer for sale and sell cannabis paraphernalia to individuals 21 years of age or older."Cannabis plant" or "plant." A plant of the genus cannabis at any stage of growth with a total THC concentration of more than 0.3% on a dry weight basis."Cannabis processor." A person licensed to process cannabis in this Commonwealth under section 708 as a Category 1 cannabis processor or Category 2 cannabis microprocessor.20250HB1200PN1641 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Cannabis product." A product that has been processed and is composed of cannabis and other ingredients that are intended for consumption or use, including the following:(1) cannabis concentrates;(2) edible products;(3) beverages;(4) topical products; and(5) ointments, oils and tinctures."Cannabis store." A retail location established under Chapter 5 or collocated with an existing Pennsylvania Liquor Store that is operated and maintained by the board for the sale of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia as provided under this act."Cannabis testing laboratory." A person issued a cannabis testing laboratory permit under section 803(a) to test cannabis, cannabis flower and cannabis product."Cannabis trim." All parts, including abnormal or immature parts, of a cannabis plant, other than cannabis flower, and prior to any processing whereby the plant material is transformed into a cannabis product."Cannabis workers' cooperative." A for-profit corporation incorporated in accordance with the requirements of 15 Pa.C.S. Ch.77 (relating to workers' cooperative corporation)."Certified social and economic equity applicant." An applicant that applied as a social and economic equity applicant that has been certified as meeting the criteria of a social and economic equity applicant by the board."Certified social and economic equity licensee." A cannabis entity that applied as a social and economic equity applicant, was certified as a social and economic equity applicant by the 20250HB1200PN1641 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 board and has been issued a cannabis entity license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act."Commonwealth agency." A department, board, commission or any other agency or office of the Commonwealth under the jurisdiction of the Governor."Consumption." The act of ingesting, inhaling, absorbing or otherwise introducing cannabis flower or cannabis products into the human body."Controlled Substance Act." The act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act."Controlling interest." Either of the following:(1) For a publicly traded domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other form of publicly traded legal entity, a controlling interest is an interest if a person's sole voting rights under State law or corporate articles or bylaws entitle the person to elect or appoint one or more of the members of the board of directors or other governing board or the ownership or beneficial holding of 5% or more of the securities of the publicly traded corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other form of publicly traded legal entity, unless this presumption of control or ability to elect is rebutted by clear and convincing evidence.(2) For a privately held domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, limited liability company or other form of privately held legal entity, a controlling interest is the holding of securities of 15% or more in the legal entity, unless this presumption of control is rebutted by 20250HB1200PN1641 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 clear and convincing evidence."Cultivation." The growing, cloning, harvesting, drying, curing, grading and trimming of cannabis plants."Electronic cannabis smoking device." An electronic device that delivers cannabis flower or cannabis products through vaporization and inhalation. The term does not include a device designed to inhale nicotine or an "electronic cigarette" as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 6305(k) (relating to sale of tobacco products)."Essential employee." The term includes, but is not limited to, an individual employed by a cannabis entity applicant, licensee, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act, and determined by the board to be an officer, director, manager or supervisor or an individual otherwise empowered to make discretionary decisions related to the operations and conduct of a cannabis entity license and whose duties are essential to the effective and continual operation of a cannabis entity license as provided under this act and regulations of the board."Historically impacted community." A census tract, comparable geographic area or demographic established by the board that has among the highest rates of arrest, conviction and incarceration related to cannabis or has historical economic disinvestment, poverty and negative health outcomes caused by cannabis use and enforcement."Immature cannabis plant." A cannabis plant that is not in the cannabis flowering stage."Indirect cannabis business." A business that is not a cannabis entity that provides goods or services ancillary to the cultivating, processing, transporting or selling of cannabis, 20250HB1200PN1641 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabis flower or cannabis products."Industrial hemp." As defined in 3 Pa.C.S. § 702 (relating to definitions)."Justice-involved individual." An individual who has a cannabis arrest or a cannabis conviction that is eligible for expungement or a vacated sentence under this act."Labor peace agreement." An agreement between a cannabis entity and a bona fide labor organization that seeks to represent employees which:(1) Requires that the cannabis entity and the bona fide labor organization and its members agree to the uninterrupted delivery of services and to refrain from actions intended to or having the effect of interrupting such services; and(2) Includes any other terms agreed to by the parties, which may relate to, but need not be limited to:(i) alternate procedures related to recognizing the bona fide labor organization for bargaining purposes;(ii) public statements;(iii) workplace access; and(iv) the provision of employee contract information.(3) Begins at the time of invocation by a bona fide labor organization and not at the point of ratification."Low-dose cannabis." Cannabis flower with no more than 10% total THC or a cannabis product in food or beverage form that is a single serving with no more than 2.5 milligrams of total THC per serving."Medical Marijuana Act." The act of April 17, 2016 (P.L.84, No.16), known as the Medical Marijuana Act."Member of an impacted family." A parent, legal guardian, legal ward, child, spouse or dependent of a justice-involved 20250HB1200PN1641 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual."Municipality." A city, borough, incorporated town or township."On-site consumption premises." The area of on-site consumption licensee approved by the board for on-site consumption by individuals 21 years of age or older of cannabis flower and cannabis products."Other paraphernalia." Any device, equipment, product or materials which is used, intended for use or designed for use in planting, propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting, composting, compounding, converting, producing, processing, preparing, testing, analyzing, packaging, repackaging or storing cannabis."Permittee." A person that holds a permit approved by the board to engage in a regulated activity under this act."Person." A natural person, corporation, foundation, organization, business trust, estate, limited liability company, partnership, limited liability partnership, association or any other form of legal business entity as defined under 42 Pa.C.S. § 8368.2 (relating to definitions)."Personal amount of cannabis." The following:(1) The equivalent of 42.524 grams or less of cannabis flower.(2) 5 grams or less of cannabis concentrate.(3) any amount of cannabis product other than cannabis concentrate that contains, in the aggregate, no more than 500 milligrams of total THC.(4) An equivalent amount of a combination of cannabis flower, cannabis concentrate and cannabis product."Personal use." The acquisition or possession of cannabis 20250HB1200PN1641 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 flower or a cannabis product for use by an individual if there is no evidence of an intent to:(1) sell or facilitate the sale of the cannabis flower or cannabis product; or(2) distribute, transfer or facilitate the distribution or transfer of the cannabis flower or cannabis product to an individual not lawfully permitted to possess cannabis product."Pesticide." The following apply:(1) A substance or mixture of substances intended for preventing, destroying, repelling or mitigating any pest, and a substance or mixture of substances intended for use as a plant regulator, defoliant or desiccant.(2) The term shall not include any substance that is a "new animal drug" under section 201(v) of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act (52 Stat. 1040, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.), or that has been determined by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services not to be a new animal drug by a regulation establishing conditions of use.(3) The term shall not include "animal feed" under section 201(w) of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act."Principal."(1) An officer, director or other person who directly holds a beneficial interest in or ownership of the securities of an applicant for a cannabis entity license.(2) A person who has a controlling interest in an applicant for a cannabis entity license or a cannabis entity licensee or has the ability to elect a majority of the board of directors of an a cannabis entity licensee or to otherwise control a cannabis entity licensee, lender or other licensed 20250HB1200PN1641 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 financial institution of an applicant for a cannabis entity license or a cannabis entity licensee, other than a bank or lending institution, which makes a loan or holds a mortgage or other lien acquired in the ordinary course of business, underwriter of an applicant for a cannabis entity license or a cannabis entity licensee or other person or employee of an applicant for a cannabis entity license or a cannabis entity licensee deemed to be a principal by the board."Private residence." A home or dwelling that is owned, rented or occupied by an individual, family or group as a personal domicile."Process." The processing, extracting, compounding, conversion or any other necessary activity to make cannabis into cannabis products."Processed hemp." Industrial hemp that has been processed to a total THC concentration greater than:(1) 0.3%; or(2) one half milligram per serving or individual product unit, and 2 milligrams per package for products sold in multiple servings or units."Regulated activity." An activity authorized under this act or by the board related to the cultivation, processing, transportation, testing or sale of cannabis, cannabis flower, cannabis products or cannabis paraphernalia for which a person would be required to obtain a license, permit, registration, certification or other authorization from the board as provided under this act and regulations of the board."Secure facility or area." A room, greenhouse, building or other enclosed area or outdoor space used to cultivate, process, store, transport, deliver or sell cannabis, cannabis flower and 20250HB1200PN1641 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabis products which is equipped with locks or other security devices and which is accessible only by the board, the bureau, the Department of Revenue, the Department of Agriculture or designated employees and by principles and employees of a cannabis entity or other persons authorized under this act or by the board."Social and economic equity applicant." An applicant for a license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act that has a household annual income below 200% of the Area Median Income in their county of residence and meets either of the following criteria:(1) Is comprised of at least 65% ownership and control by one or more individuals who:(i) are justice-involved individuals; or(ii) are members of an impacted family.(2) Is comprised of at least 65% ownership and control by one or more individuals who for at least 5 of the preceding 10 years resided in or otherwise was a member of a historically impacted community."THC." A delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol and any structural, optical or geometric isomers of tetrahydrocannabinol, including delta-7, delta-8 and delta-10 tetrahydrocannabinol, tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, tetrahydrocannabiphorol, hexaydrocannabinol and any other substance that the board determines has hallucinogenic or intoxicating effects on the mind or body, however derived or manufactured, including substances derived or manufactured synthetically or from industrial hemp or industrial hemp materials. The board shall determine, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture and the Attorney General, the other substances having similar 20250HB1200PN1641 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 effects."Total THC." The sum, after the application of any necessary conversion factor, of the percentage by weight of THC.CHAPTER 2REGULATION OF CANNABISSection 201. Regulation and treatment of cannabis.Subject to the provisions of this act, the following acts, devices and products are deemed lawful:(1) The regulation of cannabis by the board as provided in this act.(2) The cultivation of cannabis by cannabis cultivators.(3) The processing of cannabis by cannabis processors.(4) The sale to cannabis consumers of cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia by cannabis stores.(5) The sale to home cultivation permittees of cannabis seeds by cannabis stores.(6) The sale of cannabis paraphernalia by a cannabis paraphernalia permittee.(7) The purchase, possession, consumption, display or transport of a personal amount of cannabis by a cannabis consumer.(8) The purchase, possession and use of cannabis paraphernalia by an individual 21 years of age or older.(9) The purchase, possession and use of other paraphernalia by a person in a manner authorized by this act.(10) The home cultivation of two immature cannabis plants and two mature cannabis plants by a home cultivation permittee.(11) Leasing or otherwise allowing the use of property 20250HB1200PN1641 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 owned, occupied or controlled by any person engaging in a regulated activity as authorized under this act.Section 202. Exemption from criminal or civil penalties in other acts.The following acts shall not be an offense under the Controlled Substance Act, 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses) or any other provision of law or regulation, including any ordinance, law or regulation of a municipality, and may not be used as a basis for the seizure or forfeiture of assets under 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 5803 (relating to asset forfeiture), 5805 (relating to forfeiture procedure), 5806 (relating to motion for return of property), 5807 (relating to restrictions on use), 5807.1 (relating to prohibition on adoptive seizures) and 5808 (relating to exceptions):(1) The acts deemed lawful under section 201.(2) The possession of a personal amount of cannabis.(3) The sharing for immediate use or transfer of a personal amount of cannabis between cannabis consumers, but not sale or exchange for any pecuniary gain or material benefit.(4) The cultivation, processing, delivery, transport, display, sale or testing of cannabis, cannabis flower or cannabis products or sale of cannabis paraphernalia by a person licensed, permitted, registered or certified under this act to engage in one or more of these activities in a manner allowed by this act.Section 202.1. Discrimination prohibited.(a) Employment.--(1) An individual may not be subject to penalty in any manner, or be denied any right or privilege, including, but 20250HB1200PN1641 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 not limited to, disciplinary action by an occupational or professional licensing board or bureau solely for conduct allowed under this chapter when conducted outside of the workplace and work hours.(2) It is unlawful for an employer to discriminate against an individual in hiring, terminating or any term or condition of employment, or otherwise penalizing an individual, if the discrimination is based upon any of the following:(i) The individual's use of cannabis flower or cannabis products outside of the workplace and work hours.(ii) An employer-required drug screening test that has found the person to have cannabis metabolites in their hair, blood, urine or other bodily fluids.(3) This subsection shall not preempt Federal laws requiring applicants or employees to be tested for controlled substances, including Federal laws and regulations requiring applicants or employees to be tested or the manner in which they are tested, as a condition of employment, receiving Federal funding or Federal licensing-related benefits or entering into a Federal contract.(4) Nothing in this subsection shall:(i) Be construed to:(A) Prohibit an employer from adopting reasonable drug-free workplace policies or employment policies prohibiting smoking, consuming, storing or using cannabis flower or cannabis products in the workplace or while on call if the policies are applied in a nondiscriminatory manner and are 20250HB1200PN1641 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disclosed to employees.(B) Require an employer to permit an employee to be under the influence of cannabis or use of cannabis flower or cannabis products in the employer's workplace or while performing the employee's job duties or while on call.(ii) Limit or prevent an employer from disciplining an employee or terminating employment of an employee for violating an employer's employment policies or workplace drug policy if the policies were disclosed to the employee.(b) General protections.--(1) Except as provided in this section, the Commonwealth or any political subdivision may not impose a penalty or deny a benefit or entitlement for conduct allowed under this chapter.(2) Except as provided in subsection (a)(3) and (4), the Commonwealth or any political subdivisions may not deny a driver's license, an occupational or professional license, housing assistance, social services or other benefits based on cannabis use allowed under this act.(c) Custody.--An individual's lawful purchase, possession or consumption of cannabis flower or a cannabis product shall not be the sole basis for denying custody of or visitation with a minor, unless the individual's behavior as a result of the purchase, possession or consumption of the cannabis flower or cannabis products creates an unreasonable danger to the minor that can be clearly articulated and substantiated.(d) Condition of parole and probation.--The Department of Corrections and county offices of probation may not prohibit an 20250HB1200PN1641 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual's use of cannabis flower or cannabis products or any other conduct allowed under this act unless, after individualized consideration, it has been shown by clear and convincing evidence that inclusion of the prohibition as a condition of supervision is reasonably related to the underlying crime. An individual under parole or probation shall not be punished or otherwise penalized for lawful conduct under this act unless the terms and conditions of the parole or probation prohibit an individual's cannabis use or any other conduct otherwise allowed under this act.(e) Child welfare.--The presence of a cannabinoid or cannabis metabolites in an individual's hair, blood, urine or other bodily fluids, possession of cannabis paraphernalia, conduct related to the use of cannabis flower or cannabis products or the participation in cannabis-related activities authorized under this act by a custodial or noncustodial parent, grandparent, legal guardian, foster parent or other individual charged with the well-being of a child, may be considered but not form the sole, primary or supporting basis for an action or proceeding by a child welfare agency or juvenile court. Unless the individual's actions in relation to cannabis create an unreasonable danger to the health or safety of the child or otherwise show the individual is not competent as established by clear and convincing evidence, the prohibition under this subsection shall include any of the following:(1) An adverse finding, evidence or restriction of a right or privilege in a proceeding related to the adoption of a child.(2) A fitness determination or a determination related to a foster parent, guardianship, conservatorship or 20250HB1200PN1641 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 trusteeship.(f) Medical care.--For the purpose of receiving medical care, including an organ transplant, an individual's use of cannabis flower or cannabis products under this chapter shall not constitute the use of an illicit substance or otherwise disqualify an individual from receiving medical care.(g) Firearms possession.--An individual may not be prohibited or otherwise restricted from lawful firearm ownership solely for using cannabis flower or cannabis products or engaging in a regulated activity. The Pennsylvania State Police shall take measures to revise firearms applications or take other necessary actions to ensure compliance with this subsection.Section 203. Home cultivation.(a) Permit.--Notwithstanding any provision of the Medical Marijuana Act, the Controlled Substance Act, or any other law or regulation to the contrary, if granted a home cultivation permit under subsection (c), an individual who is a resident of this Commonwealth and 21 years of age or older may cultivate, process or otherwise possess up to two mature cannabis plants and two immature cannabis plants for use by the home cultivation permit holder without holding a cannabis cultivator license or cannabis processor license under this act.(b) Limitations and prohibitions.--(1) Home cultivation of cannabis authorized under this section:(i) Must take place in an enclosed and secure space, room or area within the individual's private residence or on the grounds of the individual's private residence.(ii) Must be cultivated from cannabis seeds 20250HB1200PN1641 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purchased from a cannabis store, which may not be given or sold to any other person.(iii) May not be stored or placed in a location or otherwise positioned inside or on the grounds of the individual's private residence in a manner which would subject the cannabis plants to ordinary public view.(iv) May be prohibited by an owner, lessee or other person in lawful possession of the private residence.(2) An individual holding a home cultivation permit shall take reasonable precautions to ensure that the cannabis plants are secure from unauthorized access, including unauthorized access by an individual under 21 years of age.(3) Home cultivation under this section may only occur in a residential property or on the grounds of a residential property with the consent of the owner, lessee or other person in lawful possession of the residential property.(4) A private residence, including a private home, unit in a tenement building, apartment or condominium unit, which is not divided into multiple dwelling units may not contain more than two mature cannabis plants and two immature cannabis plants at any one time.(5) Cannabis plants may only be maintained, tended and used by an individual who holds a valid home cultivation permit issued by the board under this section and may not be given or transferred to any other person.(c) Home cultivation permit.--(1) An individual under this subsection may apply to the board for a home cultivation permit in the form and manner as the board shall prescribe in regulation.(2) An application for a home cultivation permit may be 20250HB1200PN1641 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 submitted to the board electronically. The following apply:(i) An application for a home cultivation permit shall be accompanied by a $100 fee.(ii) A home cultivation permit shall be renewed annually upon approval of the board and payment of a $100 renewal fee.(d) Penalties.--An individual who violates this section shall:(1) Be assessed a civil penalty of:(i) Not more than $500 for a first offense.(ii) Not more than $1,000 for a second offense.(iii) Not more than $5,000 for a third or subsequent offense and be subject to revocation of the individual's home cultivation permit.(2) Be subject to the applicable provisions of the Controlled Substance Act related to possession, possession with intent to deliver or possession with intent to distribute.Section 204. Unauthorized acts.(a) Prohibitions.--The following acts are prohibited:(1) The purchase, possession or consumption or attempt thereto of any amount of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower or cannabis products by an individual under 21 years of age.(2) An individual under 21 years of age knowingly and falsely representing themselves to be at least 21 years of age to a person for the purpose of purchasing or receiving cannabis seeds, cannabis flower or cannabis products.(3) Possession by an individual 21 years of age or older of more than a personal amount of cannabis at any one time or possession of cannabis seeds without a valid home cultivation 20250HB1200PN1641 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 permit.(a.1) Continuation of possession offenses.--(1) Prior to the date noticed by the board under section 405(b)(1), no person shall:(i) possess a small amount of marihuana for personal use;(ii) possess a small amount of marihuana with the intent to distribute it but not to sell it; or(iii) distribute a small amount of marihuana but not for sale.(2) For purposes of this subsection:(i) Thirty grams of marihuana or eight grams of hashish shall be considered a small amount of marihuana.(ii) The term "marihuana" shall have the same meaning as defined in section 2 of the Controlled Substances Act.(b) Penalties.--(1) An individual under 21 years of age who violates subsection (a)(1) or (2) commits a summary offense and upon conviction shall:(i) for a first offense receive any or all of the following: a written warning, a maximum fine of $25 or be referred to a diversionary program;(ii) for a second offense receive a fine of not more than $100 and be referred to a diversionary program; or(iii) for third and any subsequent offense receive a fine of not more than $250 and be referred to a diversionary program.(2) An offense under subsection (a)(1) or (2) or (a.1) shall not be a criminal offense of record, shall not be 20250HB1200PN1641 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reportable as a criminal act and shall not be placed on the criminal record of the offender and, if the offender is a minor, shall not constitute a delinquent act under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to juvenile matters). However, a record of participation in a diversionary program under subsection (b) shall be maintained by the court, not for public view, for the purposes of imposing penalties for subsequent offenses.(3) If an individual is charged with violating subsection (a)(1) or (2), the court may admit the offender to the adjudication alternative program as authorized in 42 Pa.C.S. § 1520 (relating to adjudication alternative program) or any other preadjudication disposition.(4) The following shall apply to an individual who violates a provision of subsection (a)(3):(i) If the amount possessed is more than a personal amount of cannabis but not more than two times that amount, the individual may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $250 per incident.(ii) If the amount possessed is more than two times a personal amount of cannabis but not more than three times that amount, the individual may be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $500 per incident.(iii) If the amount possessed is more than three times a personal amount of cannabis, but not more than ten times that amount, the individual commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(iv) If the amount possessed is more than ten times a personal amount of cannabis, commits a misdemeanor of the second degree.(5) An individual that violates subsection (a.1) commits 20250HB1200PN1641 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a summary offense and shall pay a fine of $250.(c) Sale of cannabis offenses.--The sale and the possession with intent to sell an amount of cannabis seed, cannabis flower or cannabis product by a person that is not authorized to do so under this act is prohibited. A person not authorized to sell or possess with intent to distribute or sell:(1) Cannabis seeds commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(2) A personal amount of cannabis flower or cannabis product commits misdemeanor of the third degree.(3) An amount of cannabis flower or cannabis product exceeding a personal amount but less than the amounts punishable under 18 Pa.C.S. § 7508 (relating to drug trafficking sentencing and penalties), commits a misdemeanor of the second degree.(4) For purposes of this subsection, the term "sell" shall mean the transfer from one person to another for pecuniary gain or material benefit.(d) Cultivation and processing offenses.--The cultivation or processing of cannabis or cannabis product by a person that is not authorized to do so under this act is prohibited. The following apply:(1) A person not authorized to cultivate:(i) That cultivates fewer than five cannabis plants commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(ii) That cultivates at least five cannabis plants but less than 10 commits a misdemeanor of the second degree.(2) A person that processes cannabis into a cannabis product commits a misdemeanor of the second degree.20250HB1200PN1641 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Smoking or consumption.--(1) An individual may not smoke or otherwise consume cannabis flower or cannabis products:(i) In a public space.(ii) If prohibited under the act of June 13, 2008 (P.L.182, No.27), known as the Clean Indoor Air Act, or any other law enacted or regulation adopted relating to vaping or the use of electronic cigarettes or electronic cannabis smoking devices in public or an indoor public place or portion of the public place, notwithstanding if the smoking of tobacco or vaping is otherwise allowed in the public place or portion of the public place under the Clean Indoor Air Act.(2) Notwithstanding 68 Pa.C.S. (relating to real and personal property) or any other provision of law or regulation, the consumption of cannabis flower or cannabis products may be allowed by a person that owns or controls a lodging establishment as defined in 48 Pa.C.S. § 1311(g) (relating to hotelkeepers and campground owners) in up to 20% of the lodging establishment's guest rooms.(3) The smoking of cannabis flower or cannabis products may be prohibited or otherwise regulated in a tenement building, apartment or multiple dwelling premises as those terms are defined in the act of April 6, 1951 (P.L.69, No.20), known as The Landlord and Tenant Act of 1951, if the prohibition to smoke cannabis flower or use cannabis products is included in the lease agreement between the lessee and the person that owns or controls the tenement building, apartment or multiple dwelling premises.(4) An individual who violates paragraph (1) shall be 20250HB1200PN1641 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assessed a civil penalty of not more than:(i) $100 for a first offense.(ii) $200 for a second or subsequent offense.(5) As used in this subsection, the term "public space" means a street, alley, park, sidewalk, a vehicle in or upon a street, alley, park or parking area or any other place to which the public is invited.(f) Violations of the Controlled Substance Act.--The sale, distribution, manufacture or possession with intent to distribute an amount of cannabis flower or a cannabis product punishable under 18 Pa.C.S. § 7508 or other provision of law providing for a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment or subject to a sentence enhancement shall be a violation of the Controlled Substance Act and subject the person to prosecution as if the person sold or distributed the cannabis flower or cannabis product in violation of the Controlled Substance Act.(g) Additional unauthorized activities and civil penalties.--(1) In addition to any other penalty provided by Federal or State law, a person not authorized by the board that cultivates, processes, delivers, transports, sells or displays for sale cannabis, cannabis flower, cannabis products or cannabis paraphernalia shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 for each offense. Each day a person engages in unauthorized activity under this paragraph shall constitute a separate offense.(2) The Attorney General, the board, a State or local law enforcement agency or a local government unit may investigate an unauthorized activity under paragraph (1) and engage in enforcement measures, including entering into an 20250HB1200PN1641 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intergovernmental agreement to prevent the conduct of an unauthorized activity under paragraph (1).(3) In addition to any other penalty provided by Federal or State law, upon the conduct of a third or subsequent unauthorized activity under paragraph (1), a local government unit may suspend or revoke the business license of the person who engaged in the unauthorized activity.(4) A violation of paragraph (1) is an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law. Remedies, penalties and authority granted to the Attorney General under the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law shall be available for the enforcement of this act.(5) In addition to the authority granted to the Attorney General under this subsection, any business or consumer injured by a violation of paragraph (1) may bring an action to enjoin a business selling, cultivating, manufacturing, distributing or possessing cannabis, cannabis flower, cannabis products or cannabis paraphernalia without a license or permit and to recover actual damages sustained. A court shall enter judgment in an amount equal to three times actual damages and shall have discretion to award punitive damages in an amount commensurate with actual damages. The court shall award attorney fees and costs to the prevailing party.(h) Payment of civil penalties and fines.--For a civil penalty, penalty, cost or fine issued under this chapter, if the board or the court, as defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions), determines that the person violating Chapter 2 is without the financial means to pay the civil penalties, 20250HB1200PN1641 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 penalties, costs or fines immediately or in a single remittance, the board or the court may provide for payment in installments or, in the case of civil penalties, penalties, costs or fines, reduce or waive the civil penalties, penalties, costs or fines. In determining the appropriate installments, reduction or waiver, the court shall consider the person's financial resources, the person's ability to make restitution and reparations and the nature of the burden the payment will impose on the person violating Chapter 2.Section 205. Presumption.(a) No violation.--Except as provided under subsection (b), the presence of cannabis in an individual's blood or a metabolite of cannabis in an individual's blood without proof of impairment to the individual's ability to safely drive, operate or be in actual physical control of the movement of a vehicle shall not constitute a violation under 75 Pa.C.S. Ch. 38 (relating to driving after imbibing alcohol or utilizing drugs).(b) Commercial license.--Subsection (a) does not apply to an individual holding a commercial driver's license.(C) DEFINITION.--FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE TERM "CANNABIS" SHALL INCLUDE "MEDICAL MARIJUANA" AS THAT TERM IS DEFINED IN SECTION 103 OF THE MEDICAL MARIJUANA ACT.Section 206. Charges pending on effective date.(a) Notice.--If, upon the effective date of this section, charges are pending alleging a violation of the Controlled Substance Act for which the controlled substance is cannabis and no notice of mandatory minimum has been filed, the attorney for the Commonwealth shall within 30 days provide notice of the Commonwealth's intention to seek a mandatory minimum period of incarceration or aver that the Commonwealth has probable cause 20250HB1200PN1641 - 32 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to believe the alleged conduct will be subject to a sentencing enhancement, and if no notice is provided or averment made, the charge alleging the violation shall be withdrawn or dismissed.(b) Dismissal.--Unless the prosecution of the matter is disposed of by plea or by an available alternative disposition program, if the finder of fact fails to find the facts necessary to support the imposition of a mandatory minimum sentence or sentencing enhancement were proven beyond a reasonable doubt, the corresponding charge shall be dismissed and no sentence may be imposed for the offense.Section 207. Charges brought under the Controlled Substances Act.(a) Sentence enhancement.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law or court rule or regulation to the contrary, no violation of the Controlled Substance Act where the controlled substance is cannabis shall be charged unless, prior to filing, an attorney for the Commonwealth in the county where the offense allegedly occurred avers it is the intention of the Commonwealth to pursue a mandatory minimum period of incarceration under State law for the offense or that the attorney believes probable cause exists to believe that the conduct alleged to be a violation of the Controlled Substance Act may, upon conviction, subject the person charged to a sentencing enhancement at the time of sentence.(b) Withdrawal.--If, at the time of formal arraignment, the attorney for the Commonwealth does not file notice of the Commonwealth's intent to seek a mandatory minimum sentence along with the information or the maximum penalty under law listed on the information does not allow for the sentencing enhancement, the corresponding charge alleging a violation of the Controlled 20250HB1200PN1641 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Substance Act shall be withdraw by the Commonwealth or dismissed by the court.(c) Dismissal.--Unless the prosecution of the matter is disposed of by plea or by an available alternative disposition program, if the finder of fact fails to find the facts necessary to support the imposition of a mandatory minimum sentence or sentencing enhancement were proven beyond a reasonable doubt, the corresponding charge shall be dismissed and no sentence may be imposed for the offense.CHAPTER 3EFFECT ON CERTAIN CANNABIS CONVICTIONSAND EXPUNGEMENTSSection 301. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"AOPC." The Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts."Cannabis arrest." The commencement of a criminal proceeding where an individual was charged with a cannabis offense for which there has been no conviction or for which there is no final disposition listed for the charge at the associated OTN."Cannabis conviction." A conviction for a cannabis offense for which no mandatory minimum term of imprisonment has been or will be imposed by the sentencing court."Cannabis offense." As follows:(1) An offense under section 13 of the Controlled Substance Act where the controlled substance was cannabis or where the offense involved cannabis paraphernalia.(2) The term includes the attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit an offense under paragraph (1).20250HB1200PN1641 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Cannabis offense vacated by this act." A cannabis arrest or cannabis conviction."Charged." The arrest, charge or indictment of an individual for an alleged violation of the law."Commissioner." The Commissioner of the Pennsylvania State Police."Controlled Substance Act." The act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act."Conviction." Any of the following when an individual has been charged, notwithstanding whether or not a sentence has been imposed and whether or not under or subject to appeal:(1) The individual entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere.(2) The individual was found guilty following trial.(3) The individual was accepted for participation in an authorized diversion program, including probation without verdict under section 17 of the Controlled Substance Act or disposition in lieu of trial or criminal punishment under section 18 of the Controlled Substance Act.(4) The charge being resolved by any other than final disposition, other than a disposition subject to section 19 of the Controlled Substance Act."Drug identification lab." The Allegheny County, Philadelphia County, Cumberland County or Pennsylvania State Police drug identification labs or any other lab that provides drug identification services upon the request of a Pennsylvania law enforcement agency or officer."Expunge." As follows:(1) the removal of information to the degree necessary 20250HB1200PN1641 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 as to ensure no trace or indication the information existed; and(2) the elimination of all identifiers which may be used to trace the identity of an individual, allowing remaining data to be used for statistical purposes."Offense Tracking Number" or "OTN." A unique identifying number assigned to an entire set of criminal charges by the AOPC. The term includes offense tracking numbers assigned by any other State agency pursuant to a practice used before the effective date of this definition.Section 302. Identification of cannabis offenses.(a) Report.--(1) Drug identification labs shall prepare a report listing each item and each substance submitted for identification by a Pennsylvania law enforcement agency or officer and tested by the lab when the test of the item or substance detected the presence of cannabis. The report shall include: (i) the name and date of birth of each individual identified by the submitting agency or officer as the suspected owners of the item or substance;(ii) the date of the suspected offense;(iii) the name of the law enforcement agency that submitted the item or substance for testing;(iv) the submitting law enforcement agency's incident, case or complaint number, if known;(v) the item or substance tested;(vi) whether the test on the item or substance identified the presence of any other controlled substance;20250HB1200PN1641 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) other information which could reasonably assist in matching the item or substance to a filed criminal charge, complaint, information or offense tracking number; and(viii) any other information known to the lab and requested by the AOPC or the commissioner which is reasonably likely to assist the AOPC or the commissioner in conducting the case record identification under subsection (b).(2) The director of the drug identification lab shall provide the report under paragraph (1) to the AOPC and to the commissioner in writing, and in any other form or format requested, no later than 30 days after the effective date of this paragraph. Updates to the report shall be made weekly if a drug identification lab test on any item or substance detects the presence of cannabis after an initial report was submitted.(b) Case record identification.--Upon receipt of a report or updated report prepared under subsection (a), the AOPC and the commissioner shall cause the report to be compared to the criminal history record information in their respective criminal record systems to identify every cannabis offense vacated by this act. The AOPC and the commissioner shall assist one another and utilize the most efficient and cost-effective methods to accurately identify the cases and the assigned offense tracking number, including performing the following: (1) The AOPC shall transmit to the Pennsylvania State Police central repository the record of each charged cannabis offense and cannabis conviction believed to have been vacated or required to be expunged under this chapter.20250HB1200PN1641 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) If the Pennsylvania State Police central repository determines through a validation process that a record transmitted under paragraph (1) is not a cannabis offense vacated by this act, required to be expunged under this act or does not match data held in the repository, the Pennsylvania State Police shall notify the AOPC of the determination within 30 days of receiving the information transmitted under paragraph (1).(3) The AOPC shall remove from the list of eligible records any record for which the AOPC received a notification of ineligibility or nonmatch with repository data.Section 303. Updates to and expungement of records.(a) List.--The AOPC shall provide to the courts of common pleas a list of each eligible record compiled under section 302(b) which were commenced within their judicial district and the action required to be taken on each record.(b) Required action.--Within 30 days of receiving the list under subsection (a) from the AOPC, the court of common pleas shall order the required action, including the vacating of cannabis convictions and sentences and the expungement of criminal history records, under this chapter and notify the AOPC that the required action has been ordered. After the court of common pleas has ordered the required action, the AOPC and the Pennsylvania State Police shall expunge the eligible cases from their criminal history record databases using an automated process.(c) Records.--The AOPC shall maintain records of the cannabis convictions ordered to be vacated or expunged under subsection (b).(d) Request of orders or records.--An individual with a 20250HB1200PN1641 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabis arrest whose record has been ordered expunged or a cannabis conviction ordered vacated under this section shall be provided an individualized copy of the applicable order upon request by the individual or the individual's legal representative. The individual shall make the request to the court of common pleas of the county where the conviction occurred or the record was created, except if the AOPC provides and makes known an alternative method to obtain the order. The order shall include a list of the charges ordered vacated or expunged and the dispositions of the charges.(e) Timeline and progress reports.--(1) The automated updates to criminal history records and expungements required this section shall be completed within two years of the effective date of this section.(2) Progress reports shall be submitted to the people who will receive the final report required under paragraph (3). Progress reports shall be submitted 12 months and 18 months after the effective date of this section and shall provide the recipients with a status report of the progress being made, difficulties being encountered and success achieved.(3) Upon completion of the updates to and the automatic expungement of records in their respective databases, the AOPC and the commissioner shall each prepare and submit a report to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Majority Chair and Minority Chair of the Senate Judiciary Committee and the Majority Chair and Minority Chair of the House Judiciary Committee reporting the completion. The report shall include any additional information relevant to the work completed, 20250HB1200PN1641 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including general costs incurred, difficulties encountered and recommendations for any future action needed to ensure accurate criminal history records are maintained.Section 304. Expungement of records where no conviction occurred or when acquitted.(a) Expungement required.--(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation to the contrary, including section 19 of the Controlled Substance Act and any court order or rule, each record of arrest or prosecution for a criminal offense for violation of the Controlled Substance Act where the controlled substance was cannabis or for violations of the provisions of any law governing controlled substances in this Commonwealth or any political subdivision of the Commonwealth before the effective date of this paragraph where the controlled substance was cannabis shall be promptly expunged from the official and unofficial arrest and other criminal records pertaining to the individual if the charges were not filed, withdrawn or dismissed or the individual was acquitted of the charges. Within six months of the effective date of this paragraph, the court, in writing, shall order the appropriate keepers of criminal records:(i) to expunge and destroy the official and unofficial arrest and other criminal records of an individual eligible under this section and to request from Federal and other State agencies, insofar as they are able, the return of the records and to destroy the records upon receipt;(ii) to destroy or deliver to the individual to whom the records pertain or their representative, each 20250HB1200PN1641 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 criminal record, fingerprint, photographic plate and photograph pertaining to the vacated offense and conviction and shall request the Federal Bureau of Investigation to return each record pertaining to the arrest, which shall be destroyed by the agency upon receipt; and(iii) to file with the court within 30 days, an affidavit stating that the records have been expunged and destroyed, together with the court's expunction order.(2) Upon receipt of the affidavit under paragraph (1)(ii), the court shall seal the affidavit with the original order and each copy and shall not permit any person or agency, except the individual to whom the records pertain or their representative, to examine the sealed documents.(3) The arresting agency shall destroy or deliver to the individual to whom the records pertain or their representative, each criminal record, fingerprint, photographic plate and photograph pertaining to the vacated offense and conviction and shall request the Federal Bureau of Investigation to return each record pertaining to the arrest, which shall be destroyed by the agency upon receipt.(b) Treatment.--Beginning on the effective date of this subsection, an expunged record of arrest or prosecution under this section shall not be regarded as an arrest or prosecution for the purpose of a statute, regulation, license, questionnaire or civil or criminal proceeding or for any other public or private purpose. No person shall be permitted to learn of or examine an expunged arrest or prosecution record, or of the expunction, either directly or indirectly. An individual, except the individual arrested or prosecuted, who divulges information 20250HB1200PN1641 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in violation of this subsection commits a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to imprisonment not exceeding 30 days or to pay a fine not exceeding $500, or both.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a person acting pursuant to a practice used before the effective date of this section from petitioning an appropriate court for an expunction order. The expungement relief contained in this section shall be in addition to the expungement of records of arrest or prosecution provided under section 19 of the Controlled Substance Act for other offenses under that act and listed in that section, including other offenses where the controlled substance was cannabis.(d) Retroactivity.--This section shall apply retroactively to each record of arrest or prosecution, notwithstanding whether the withdrawal, dismissal or acquittal occurred prior to the effective date of this subsection.Section 305. Cannabis convictions and sentences vacated.(a) Orders vacated.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation to the contrary, including a court order or rule:(1) Each cannabis conviction and sentence imposed on or before the effective date of this paragraph is vacated.(2) Money paid by a person to comply with a sentencing order entered on or before the effective date of this paragraph and vacated under paragraph (1) shall not be refunded, but fines paid to a county and allocated toward a cannabis conviction vacated by paragraph (1) shall be reallocated by the county to any other outstanding fines owed by the person which were imposed upon conviction for other offenses in the county. Any unsatisfied legal financial 20250HB1200PN1641 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 obligation connected to a cannabis conviction vacated by this act, including fines, fees and costs assessed by the court or otherwise attributed to the conviction, shall no longer be a legal financial obligation and no additional sums need to be paid. The AOPC shall establish general rules, guidelines and principles to ensure the fair, uniform and correct reallocation the counties shall utilize to reallocate monies previously paid and credited toward cannabis convictions vacated by this act. The individual to whom the affected records pertain shall be informed in writing of the manner in which monies previously paid have been reallocated. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including this chapter, the AOPC and counties shall maintain outside of public view all financial records relating to the manner in which sums previously paid were reallocated. The records and copies thereof shall be available for view by and receipt to the individual to whom the records pertain and any representative so designated by the individual.(3) The sentencing court may, sua sponte, authorize any imprisonment time served and credited toward a cannabis conviction vacated by paragraph (1) to be credited toward another sentence imposed by the court at the same OTN.(b) Vacating order.--The court, as deemed necessary or appropriate by the court, shall sua sponte enter an order vacating the cannabis convictions and sentences vacated under subsection (a) and any other orders necessary or appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter.Section 306. Update to and expungement of records pertaining to vacated convictions and sentences.(a) OTN with cannabis convictions only.--If the only 20250HB1200PN1641 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 convictions associated with an OTN are cannabis convictions vacated under section 305, each official and unofficial record of arrest, prosecution, conviction, sentence and other criminal record pertaining to the cannabis conviction shall be expunged as follows:(1) Within six months of the effective date of this paragraph, the court, in writing, shall order the appropriate keepers of criminal records:(i) to expunge and destroy the official and unofficial records of arrest, prosecution, conviction, sentence and other criminal records pertaining to the offenses associated with the OTN, to request from Federal and other State agencies, insofar as they are able, the return of the records and to destroy the records upon receipt thereof; and(ii) to file with the court within 30 days, an affidavit stating that the records have been expunged and destroyed, together with the court's expunction order.(2) Upon receipt of the affidavit under paragraph (1)(ii), the court shall seal the affidavit with the original order and each copy and shall not permit any person or agency to examine the sealed documents.(3) The arresting agency shall destroy or deliver to the individual to whom the records pertain or their representative, each criminal record, fingerprint, photographic plate and photograph pertaining to the vacated offense and conviction and shall request the Federal Bureau of Investigation to return each record pertaining to the arrest, which shall be destroyed by the agency upon receipt.(4) Expunged records shall not be regarded as an arrest, 20250HB1200PN1641 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prosecution, conviction or sentence for the purpose of any statute, regulation, license, questionnaire or civil or criminal proceeding or for any other public or private purpose. No person shall be permitted to learn of or examine an expunged arrest or prosecution, or of the expunction, either directly or indirectly. An individual, except the individual arrested, prosecuted, convicted or sentenced, who divulges information in violation of this subsection shall be guilty of a summary offense and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to imprisonment not exceeding 30 days or to pay a fine not exceeding $500, or both.(5) Nothing contained in this section shall prohibit a person acting pursuant to a practice used before the effective date of this paragraph from petitioning an appropriate court for an expunction order or other relief or order related to the expungement of records.(6) This section shall apply retroactively to any records of arrest, prosecution, conviction or sentence for a cannabis offense notwithstanding whether the offense, arrest, prosecution, conviction or sentence occurred prior to the effective date of this paragraph.(b) OTN with additional convictions.--If, in addition to a cannabis conviction vacated under section 305, an OTN is associated with a conviction for an offense which is not a cannabis conviction, the criminal history record shall be updated and the disposition of each cannabis conviction vacated under section 305 shall be, and the criminal history record shall indicate, the cannabis conviction has been vacated. Each vacated offense shall be expunged from the criminal history record maintained in the database. The AOPC and the commissioner 20250HB1200PN1641 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall take necessary and appropriate action to ensure that each keeper of criminal history records and recipients of criminal history records update the record to reflect the updated disposition.(c) Treatment.--Beginning on the effective date of this subsection, a cannabis conviction or sentence vacated under section 305 shall not be regarded as a conviction or sentence for the purpose of any statute or regulation or license or questionnaire or any civil or criminal proceeding or any other public or private purpose.Section 307. Maintenance records.The AOPC shall maintain records of the cases ordered vacated or expunged under this chapter. Any individual whose record has been ordered vacated or expunged under this chapter shall be provided an individualized copy of the order upon request by the individual or their legal representative to the court of common pleas or AOPC. The order shall include a list of the charges ordered expunged and the dispositions of the charges as vacated.Section 308. Cannabis simplified petition expungement process.(a) Update or correction.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, after June 30, 2026, any individual believing their Pennsylvania criminal history record contains information pertaining to offenses impacted by this chapter which is eligible to be vacated, expunged or is inaccurate or incomplete may seek to have their record updated or corrected by simplified petition under this section.(b) Simplified petition process.--(1) The AOPC shall prepare an online simplified petition to update or correct a criminal history record of an individual under subsection (a) which can be completed by the 20250HB1200PN1641 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual without needing legal representation. The petition shall require the individual to allege only that they seek to update or correct their criminal history record or expunge an arrest, charge or conviction arising under the Controlled Substance Act related to cannabis and bring their record into compliance with this chapter, the county in which the arrest, charge or prosecution occurred, and, if known, the approximate date of the arrest, charge, prosecution or conviction. The petition may provide the individual with the option to provide additional information known to the individual to assist the court in identifying each record sought to be updated, corrected or expunged.(2) The simplified petition may be filed electronically. The petition may be filed in hard copy with the clerk of courts in the county in which the case was charged or prosecuted. There shall be no filing fee for the petition.(3) The court shall serve the petition on the district attorney in the county in which the petition is filed. The district attorney shall insert into the petition any missing or additional information necessary for the update, correction or expungement to be granted. The petition shall be granted unless the district attorney objects within 60 days. The district attorney may object only on the grounds that:(i) the district attorney could not identify the case to which the petition refers; or(ii) the district attorney determines the update, correction or expungement sought by the petitioner is not an update, correction or expungement provided for and in compliance with this chapter.20250HB1200PN1641 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) An individual whose petition is objected to under this subsection may request within 60 days of the objection a hearing on whether the petition shall be granted. The individual may file a request for the assistance of counsel and a statement of indigency with the court. If the individual was found to be indigent for the individual's original defense of the case, the individual shall be entitled to assistance of counsel for the hearing.(5) In the hearing under paragraph (4), the district attorney shall prove by clear and convincing evidence that the petitioner is not entitled to the requested update, correction, vacating or expungement under this act. Unless the district attorney so proves, the petition shall be granted.(6) Within 90 days of the filing of a petition that has not been objected to by the district attorney or within 30 days of a petition being granted by the court under paragraph (5), the court of common pleas shall order the update, correction, vacating or expungement of the case. The order shall be served upon the petitioner.CHAPTER 4ADDITIONAL MEMBERS OF THE LIQUOR CONTROL BOARDSection 401. Continued authority of the Liquor Control Board.(a) Continued authority.--The Liquor Control Board established under the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, shall have the same powers and perform the same duties and functions by law vested in and imposed on the Liquor Control Board not otherwise amended or transferred under this act. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the board from utilizing existing staff or resources to 20250HB1200PN1641 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 perform the duties of this act.(b) Administrative officers and board members.--All appointive administrative officers or board members holding office in the Liquor Control Board in effect on the effective date of this subsection shall continue in office on the Liquor Control Board until the term for which they were respectively appointed shall expire or until death, resignation or removal from office.(c) Existing rules.--Any rules and regulations promulgated prior to the effective date of this subsection shall continue to be the rules and regulations of the Liquor Control Board until such time as the regulations are modified or repealed by the board.Section 402. Membership of the board.(a) Additional members of the Liquor Control Board.--(1) In addition to the three board member positions created under section 201 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, two additional members shall be appointed by the Governor by and with the advice and consent of two-thirds of all the members of the Senate.(2) Not more than three appointees to the board may be from the same political party as the Governor.(b) Terms.--Of the members first appointed to the newly established vacancies under subsection (a)(1), one member shall serve a term of three years and one member shall serve a term of four years. Subsequent terms shall be for four years, ending on the third Tuesday in May. A member may continue to hold office for a period not to exceed six months beyond the expiration of that member's term if a successor to that member has not been 20250HB1200PN1641 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 duly qualified and appointed under this section. Each of the members shall receive an annual salary in accordance with the act of September 30, 1983 (P.L.160, No.39), known as the Public Official Compensation Law.(c) Requirements.--Unless otherwise specified under this act, all qualifications and requirements under Article II of the Liquor Code regarding board membership and board governance shall continue and apply to newly appointed members.(d) Expertise.--At least one member appointed under subsection (a)(1)(ii) shall have expertise in cannabis markets and one member shall have expertise in public health.(e) Quorum.--A majority of three members appointed to the board shall constitute a quorum.Section 403. Additional powers and duties of board.(a) Scope.--The board shall have all the duties, functions and powers necessary and appropriate to enable the board to administer and enforce this act. The authority of the board extends to the regulation and control of cannabis, cannabis flower, cannabis products, cannabis paraphernalia, cannabis stores and persons that hold a cannabis entity license, permit, registration or certificate and any other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act.(b) Authority.--In addition to the duties under section 207 of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, the duties, functions and powers of the board shall include, but not be limited to, the following:(1) Buy, possess and sell cannabis seeds, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia consistent with this act. The board may buy cannabis seeds, cannabis flower and cannabis products from cannabis 20250HB1200PN1641 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cultivators and cannabis processors at the lowest price and in the greatest variety reasonably obtainable or may offer shelf space in cannabis stores to cannabis cultivators and cannabis processors. If the board offers shelf space, the board may charge:(i) A shelving fee.(ii) A dispensing fee.(2) Fix the wholesale and retail prices of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia to be sold in cannabis stores. The following apply:(i) The board may fix retail prices based on market supply and demand or, if providing shelf space, based upon prices recommended by the cannabis cultivators and cannabis processors for their cannabis seeds, cannabis flower and cannabis products.(ii) The board may discount the price of discontinued items.(iii) The board shall establish procedures to promote cannabis seeds, cannabis flower and cannabis products originating from cannabis microbusinesses and certified social and economic equity licensees.(3) On a quarterly basis, the board shall publish a listing of the wholesale and cannabis store retail prices on the board's publicly accessible Internet website.(4) Determine the municipalities within which cannabis stores shall be established and the locations of the cannabis stores within each municipality.(5) Through the Department of General Services as the agent, lease, furnish and equip buildings, warehouses, rooms 20250HB1200PN1641 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and other accommodations as required for the operation of cannabis stores(6) Regulate the cultivating, processing, transporting, storing, testing, delivering, handling, disposal and sale of cannabis seeds, cannabis plants, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia under this act.(7) Fix, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture, the standards of cultivating and processing of cannabis, cannabis flower and cannabis products to be sold or offered for sale to cannabis consumers in this Commonwealth.(8) Grant, suspend, deny, condition or revoke any license, permit, registration or certificate for the cultivating, processing, transporting, storing, testing, delivering, handling and selling of cannabis, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act and to authorize the transfer of a cannabis entity license to another person as provided under this act.(9) Employ individuals as necessary to carry out the powers and duties of the board, who shall serve at the board's pleasure. An employee of the board shall be considered a State employee for the purposes of 71 Pa.C.S. Pt. XXV (relating to retirement for State employees and officers).(10) Promulgate, amend or rescind regulations as necessary and appropriate to carry out the intent and provisions of this act.(11) Restrict access to confidential and proprietary information and data in the possession of the board which has been obtained under this act and ensure that the 20250HB1200PN1641 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 confidentiality of information is maintained and protected. Records shall be retained by the board for seven years.(12) Appoint advisory groups and committees to provide assistance to the board to carry out the purposes and objectives of this act.(13) Exercise the powers and perform the duties in relation to the administration of the board as are necessary but not specifically vested under this act, including, but not limited to, budgetary and fiscal matters.(14) If public health, safety or welfare imperatively requires emergency action and the board incorporates a finding to that effect in an order, order the administrative seizure of cannabis, cannabis flower, cannabis products or cannabis paraphernalia, issue a cease and desist order or take any other action necessary to protect public health and safety and effectuate and enforce the policy and purpose of this act.(15) Adopt and promulgate regulations and issue declaratory rulings, guidance and industry advisories.(16) Enter into contracts for the purposes of carrying out the powers and duties of the board under this act.(17) Hold hearings and inquiries, subpoena witnesses, compel attendance of witnesses, administer oaths and examine an individual under oath and require the production of books and records relative to the hearing or inquiry. A subpoena issued under this paragraph shall be governed by the applicable provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. (relating to judiciary and judicial procedure).(18) Enter into memoranda of understanding or agreements with other Commonwealth agencies as deemed appropriate to 20250HB1200PN1641 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 effectuate the policy and purposes of this act.(19) Establish, levy and collect fees.(20) Establish cannabis diversion controls, packaging and labeling requirements and advertising restrictions.(21) Establish requirements for the equipment, management and operation of cannabis stores and warehouses in which cannabis, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia are kept or sold and the books and records to be kept therein.(22) Issue bonds.(23) Levy fines, penalties or other sanctions for violation of this act.(24) Provide compliance education to cannabis entities and their employees and contractors.(25) Determine where and what classes, varieties and brands of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower and cannabis products are made available to the public and where the cannabis seeds, cannabis flower and cannabis products may be sold.(26) Acquire or contract with a third-party vendor to establish or develop an inventory verification system for use by cannabis stores.(27) Acquire or contract with a third-party vendor to establish a point-of-sale system for use by all cannabis stores.(28) Adopt and enforce appropriate rules and regulations to ensure the equitable sale and distribution of available cannabis seeds, cannabis flower and cannabis products at cannabis stores when the demand is greater than the supply or supply is greater than demand.20250HB1200PN1641 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (29) Review and approve or deny a management service agreement entered into or proposed to be entered into between a cannabis entity or cannabis entity applicant and another person and may require, by regulation, the entities to secure authorization from the board to provide the services outlined in the management service agreement.(30) Allow for the leasing of shelf-space in cannabis stores by cannabis cultivators or cannabis processors for the sale of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower or cannabis products if the board determines it to be in the best interest of cannabis stores.(31) Approve and review and update no less than every four years guidelines established and issued by the Office of Social Equity under section 601(c)(3) to assess, identify and determine which areas are historically impacted communities and how to assess if someone is a member of a historically impacted community.(32) Conduct or commission an initial comprehensive market analysis within 180 days of the effective date of this paragraph, which shall be complete within one year of commencement of the sale of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower, cannabis products or cannabis paraphernalia in cannabis stores.(33) Conduct comprehensive market analysis every three years.(34) Certify applicants that meet the criteria as a social and economic applicant as a certified social and economic equity applicants.(35) Certify cannabis entities as certified social and economic equity licensees.20250HB1200PN1641 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (36) The board shall consider each of the following as indicative, but not determinative, of a finding that a labor organization is a "bona fide labor organization":(i) The labor organization has been recognized or certified as the bargaining representative for medical marijuana organization, cannabis entity or cannabis store employees in this Commonwealth.(ii) The labor organization has executed current collective bargaining agreements with medical marijuana organizations in this Commonwealth.(iii) The labor organization has spent resources as part of a current and active attempt to organize and represent employees of medical marijuana organizations in this Commonwealth.(iv) The labor organization has filed the annual report required by 29 U.S.C. § 431(b) (relating to report of labor organizations) for the three years immediately preceding.(v) The labor organization has audited financial reports covering the three years immediately preceding.(vi) The labor organization has written bylaws or constitution for the three years immediately preceding.(37) Acquire or contract with a third-party vendor to establish or develop a seed-to-sale tracking system.(38) Collect taxes imposed under this act on the sale of cannabis and cannabis products in cannabis stores.Section 404. Temporary regulations.(a) Promulgation.--In order to facilitate the prompt implementation of this act, the board shall promulgate temporary regulations within 180 days of the effective date of this 20250HB1200PN1641 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection that shall expire no later than five years following the publication of the temporary regulations. The temporary regulations promulgated by the board under this section are not subject to:(1) Section 612 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) Sections 201, 202, 203, 204 and 205 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.769, No.240), referred to as the Commonwealth Documents Law.(3) Sections 204(b) and 301(10) of the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(4) The act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(b) Expiration.--The board's authority to adopt temporary regulations under subsection (a) shall expire five years after the effective date of this subsection. Regulations adopted after this period shall be promulgated as provided by law.(c) Contents.--Temporary and final-form regulations adopted by the board shall include, but not be limited to, the following:(1) Procedures for the issuance, denial, renewal, sanction, suspension and revocation of a license to operate a cannabis establishment by an applicant for a cannabis entity license. The procedures shall include a biennial evaluation of whether the number of each kind of cannabis entity license is sufficient to meet market demand.(2) Licensing goals and measures for social and economic equity applicants and cannabis microbusiness applicants who are residents of this Commonwealth.20250HB1200PN1641 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Security and surveillance requirements for cannabis establishments.(4) Requirements to prevent the sale or diversion of cannabis, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia to individuals under 21 years of age, including, but not limited to, identification requirements.(5) Packaging, processing and branding regulations to prevent the appeal of cannabis, cannabis flower, cannabis products, cannabis paraphernalia and other paraphernalia to individuals under 21 years of age.(6) Labeling and packaging requirements for cannabis seeds, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia cultivated, processed, transported, stored, delivered, handled or sold, including, but not limited to, clear and understandable health and safety information, warning labels, serving sizes and child resistant packaging.(7) Health and safety standards, protocols and worker protections for the cultivating, processing, storing, transporting, testing and selling or offering for sale of cannabis, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia.(8) Restrictions on the advertising and display of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower, cannabis products, cannabis paraphernalia and other paraphernalia, including restrictions on advertising to individuals under 21 years of age.(9) Procedures for the board to conduct announced and unannounced visits to a cannabis establishment and a cannabis testing laboratory to make or cause to be made investigations for the efficient and proper administration of this act and any other laws which may be enacted concerning any form of 20250HB1200PN1641 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabis or the cultivating, processing, distributing, testing, transporting, delivering, selling or offering for sale of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia, including the inspection of the premises of a proposed cannabis establishment and cannabis testing laboratory or the inspection and search of a cannabis entity's cannabis establishment and cannabis testing laboratory, the search of associated buildings and the inspection and examination of the books, records, accounts, documents and papers of the cannabis entity and cannabis testing laboratory.(10) Recordkeeping requirements.(11) Procedures for inspecting and testing samples of cannabis, cannabis flower and cannabis products.(12) Conditions under which cannabis cultivated by a cannabis cultivator or cannabis processed by a cannabis processor may be donated for research purposes.(13) Administrative sanctions and civil penalties for violating a regulation of the board.(14) Requirements for a cannabis establishment and cannabis testing laboratory to ensure safe cultivation, processing, storage, transport and disposal of any form of cannabis, including ventilation, temperature, size and timeline of storage.(15) Requirements to govern the testing of any form of cannabis, cannabis flower and cannabis products by a cannabis testing laboratory including stability and compliance testing.(16) Requirements for home cultivation permittees.(d) Informational sessions.--After the promulgation of 20250HB1200PN1641 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 temporary regulations under subsection (a) pertaining to applications and the application process and after the issuance of guidelines determining historically impacted communities and prior to the date established by the board to commence the application process, the board shall:(1) Conduct a series of regional informational sessions to inform and educate the residents of this Commonwealth regarding the regulation of cannabis, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia in this Commonwealth, including information and education on the opportunities, requirements and processes for submitting an application to the board for a cannabis entity license, permit, certification or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act. The board shall conduct at least two informational sessions in each region of this Commonwealth and may conduct additional informational sessions upon demand by the governing body of a municipality.(2) Establish a minimum of five regions within this Commonwealth for the purpose of conducting information sessions. The department shall consider the following when establishing regions:(i) Regional population.(ii) Access to public transportation.(iii) Any other factor the board deems relevant.(e) Publication.--The board shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau of promulgation of temporary regulations for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin no later than 180 days after the effective date of this subsection.Section 405. Notice of commencement of sales in cannabis 20250HB1200PN1641 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stores.(a) Publications.--(1) At least 90 days before commencing the sale of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower, cannabis products or cannabis paraphernalia in cannabis stores, the board shall provide notice of its intent to commence sales by transmitting the notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(2) Concurrently with the publication of the notice in the Pennsylvania Bulletin under paragraph (1), the board shall, on the board's publicly accessible Internet website:(i) Post the same notice.(ii) Provide information about the sections of this act that will go into effect within 90 days of the publication under paragraph (1), as provided for under section 2105.(3) No later than 45 days after the notice under subsection (a)(1) is published, the board shall publish the same notice in at least one newspaper of general circulation in each county of the Commonwealth. (b) Content of notice.--The notice under subsection (a) shall contain the following:(1) The specific date that the initial cannabis stores will open for the sale of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower, cannabis products or cannabis paraphernalia.(2) The locations and hours of the initial cannabis stores that will open for sale on that date.(3) Information about who is legally permitted to be a cannabis consumer and what a cannabis consumer is permitted 20250HB1200PN1641 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to do under this act.(4) Information about home cultivation permits and how to obtain one.(c) Limitation.--The board may not transmit notice for publication under subsection (a) until at least two cannabis stores are prepared to open in each of the five regions established under section 404(d)(2).Section 406. Annual report by the board.(a) Report required.--The board shall annually submit a report to the General Assembly on the board's administration of this act. The report shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:(1) retail operations, merchandising and retail sales data;(2) board finances;(3) cannabis store operations;(4) distribution and logistics;(5) communications and marketing;(6) issuance or revocation of licenses, permits or any other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act and compliance data;(7) compliance of licensees, permittees or other persons authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act and other compliance data as determined by the board; and(8) information related to the method and rationale for pricing cannabis seeds, cannabis flower and cannabis products.(b) (Reserved).CHAPTER 5PENNSYLVANIA CANNABIS STORES20250HB1200PN1641 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 501. Pennsylvania Cannabis Stores.The following shall apply:(1) The board shall establish, operate and maintain cannabis stores throughout this Commonwealth for the sale of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia in accordance with the provisions of and the regulations promulgated under this act. The following apply:(2) A cannabis store may not be located within a minimum of 1,000 feet from an elementary school, secondary school or day care.(3) The board may colocate a cannabis store with a Pennsylvania Liquor Store established under the act of act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code.(4) When determining a colocation under paragraph (3), the board shall consider the public health effects prior to approving a colocation.(5) Upon determination of the location of a cannabis store in a municipality, the board shall give notice of the location by public advertisement in one newspaper of general circulation. The notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the outside of the premises in which the proposed cannabis store is to operate or, in the event that a new structure is to be built, in a similarly visible location. If, within five days after the appearance of the advertisement, or of the last day upon which the notice was posted, 100 or more taxpayers residing within a quarter of a mile of a proposed cannabis store, or the City Solicitor in a city of the first class, file a petition with the court of common pleas of the county averring that the proposed 20250HB1200PN1641 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabis store is objectionable because of its proximity to a church, school or to private residences, the court shall hold a hearing affording an opportunity to the protestants and to the board to present evidence. The court shall render its decision immediately upon the conclusion of the testimony. The court's decision shall not be subject to appeal. If the court determines that the proposed cannabis store is undesirable for the reasons stated in the petition, the board shall abandon it and find another cannabis store.(6) Cannabis flower and cannabis products may not be consumed on the premises of a cannabis store.Section 502. Selection of employees.(a) Civil service.--Employees of the board, except as provided under this act, shall be appointed and employed subject to the provisions of 71 Pa.C.S. Pt. III (relating to civil service reform).(b) Training required.--Cannabis store employees must receive training specific to cannabis seeds, cannabis flower and cannabis product strains, effects, storage, health and safety, security, prohibiting sales to minors, inventory and tracking, as determined by the board.(c) Recruitment.--The board shall develop and implement strategies to recruit cannabis store employees who reside in or are members of a historically impacted community.(d) Employee objection.--The board shall establish a process for an employee with an objection to storing, handling or selling cannabis seeds, cannabis flower, cannabis products or cannabis paraphernalia to submit an objection. An employee that has submitted an objection under this subsection shall not be required to store, handle or sell cannabis seeds, cannabis 20250HB1200PN1641 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 flower, cannabis products or cannabis paraphernalia nor receive an adverse employment action for filing an objection.(e) (Reserved).(f) Jurisdiction of Pennsylvania Labor Relations Board.--Except where preempted by Federal law, the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Board shall have jurisdiction over representation and unfair labor practices involving a cannabis store.(g) Cannabis experience preference.--If a candidate successfully passes a civil service appointment examination for a public position with the board as an employee or manager of a cannabis store, an additional one point per year of experience in a Pennsylvania licensed medical marijuana facility shall be added to the candidate's final examination score and the score shall determine the candidate's standing on any eligible list certified or provided to the board. A candidate may not begin or hold the public position until proof of employment being considered for additional points is provided to the board.Section 503. Management of cannabis stores.(a) Manager required.--Unless co-located with a Pennsylvania Liquor Store, each cannabis store shall be managed by an individual appointed in the manner provided in 71 Pa.C.S. Pt. III (relating to civil service reform) who shall, under the direction of the board, be responsible for carrying out the provisions of this act and the regulations adopted by the board under this act related to the equipment, management and operation of cannabis stores.(b) Recruitment.--The board shall develop and implement strategies to recruit managers who reside in a historically impacted community.(c) Additional requirements.--The board may establish 20250HB1200PN1641 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 additional training, qualifications and requirements for managers that exceed the requirements for employees under section 502.Section 504. Sales at Pennsylvania Cannabis Stores.(a) Limit on purchase.--A cannabis store may not sell more than the following amounts to a cannabis consumer in a 24-hour period:(1) 42.524 grams of cannabis flower.(2) Any amount of cannabis product other than cannabis concentrate that contains, in the aggregate, more than 500 milligrams of total THC.(3) Any amount of cannabis concentrate containing greater than 400 milligrams of total THC.(4) A personal amount of cannabis.(a.1) Cannabis seed sale.--A cannabis store may only sell cannabis seeds to a cannabis consumer with a valid home cultivation permit.(b) Receipt required.--Each purchase of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower or cannabis products from a cannabis store shall receive a numbered receipt which shall show the price paid and other information as the board may prescribe. Copies of all receipts issued by a cannabis store shall be retained by and shall form part of the records of the cannabis store.(c) Cannabis paraphernalia.--Cannabis stores may sell cannabis paraphernalia to cannabis consumers.(d) Age verification required.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), each cannabis store must utilize a scan device for a valid photo driver's license or identification card issued by the Department of Transportation or by any other state to verify 20250HB1200PN1641 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the age of each individual attempting to purchase cannabis seeds, cannabis flower or cannabis products before making a sale.(2) A valid Canadian driver's license or other bona fide Canadian identification such as a Canadian-issued passport, or a valid Armed Forces of the United States identification card, a valid passport or a travel visa issued by the United States or a foreign country that contains the holder's photograph shall, for the purpose of this act, be accepted as an identification card.(3) The board shall establish a procedure for verifying:(i) the age of an individual who presents an acceptable identification card under paragraph (2) that is unable to be scanned; and(ii) that an individual attempting to purchase cannabis seeds has a valid home cultivation permit.Section 505. Health and safety protections.The following shall apply:(1) Each cannabis store must:(i) In a manner that is unobstructed and visible to cannabis consumers and other patrons of a cannabis store, have at least four conspicuously posted signs inside the cannabis store and one or more signs posted outside at or near the door or doors used to enter a cannabis store a statement in substantially the following form:If you or someone you know needs help finding a drug treatment provider or information about drug addiction and treatment, help is available. Please call 1-800-662-HELP (4357) anytime, any day. Be assured, your call is confidential.20250HB1200PN1641 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Provide brochures containing the statement under paragraph (1) which shall include information regarding the dangers of driving under the influence of cannabis, signs and symptoms of substance use disorder, the consequences of unregulated cannabis, cannabis flower and cannabis products, expected intoxicating effects, the danger of overconsumption, the dangers of cannabis flower and cannabis product consumption by minors and any other public health information determined by the board.(iii) Provide brochures containing information on the risks of cannabis products with a high total THC concentration.(2) The board:(i) shall provide cannabis stores with the signs and brochures required under paragraph (1); and(ii) may consult with the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs on the content of the signs and brochures.Section 506. Audits by the Auditor General.(a) Audits required.--(1) It shall be the duty of the Department of the Auditor General to make audits which may be necessary in connection with the administration of the financial affairs of the board and the cannabis stores. The audits shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles. Nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to require the Auditor General to conduct biannual inventories.(2) At least one audit shall be conducted each year of the financial affairs of the board. Collections made by cannabis stores shall be audited quarterly. The Auditor 20250HB1200PN1641 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 General shall submit a copy of the annual audit of the affairs of the board to the Governor, the President pro tempore of the Senate, the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives and the Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the House of Representatives. The Auditor General shall post the annual audit of the affairs of the board to its publicly accessible website.(b) Special audits.--Special audits of the financial affairs of the board and cannabis stores maintained and operated by the board may be made if the Auditor General deems it necessary and shall be made when the Governor directs the Department of the Auditor General to conduct a special audit.(c) Copies.--Copies of audits made by the Department of the Auditor General shall be promptly submitted to the board and to the Governor.CHAPTER 6SOCIAL AND ECONOMIC EQUITYSection 601. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Committee." The Social and Economic Equity Advisory Committee established under section 602.1."Fund." The Cannabis Business Development Fund established under section 603."Office." The Office of Social and Economic Equity established under section 602.Section 602. Office of Social and Economic Equity.(a) Establishment and director.--The Office of Social and 20250HB1200PN1641 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Economic Equity is established within the board and shall be under the immediate supervision of a director who shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the board.(b) Qualifications of the director.--The director of the Office of Social and Economic Equity shall have at least five years of experience in civil rights advocacy, civil rights litigation or another area of social justice.(c) Powers and duties.--The office, under the direction of the board, shall:(1) Promote inclusion and participation in the regulated cannabis industry, including through an indirect cannabis business, by persons that may qualify to be a social and economic equity applicant.(2) Within six months of appointment of the director, present to the board guidelines to identify historically impacted communities and determine if an individual is a member of a historically impacted community. When establishing the guidelines, the office shall:(i) consult with experts, including the Social and Economic Advisory Committee established under section 602.1 on the disparate impacts of communities directly harmed by policing or criminalized activities related to the sale, distribution or possession of cannabis;(ii) review other states' social and economic equity programs and qualifications; and(iii) implement a process to receive public input.(3) Review and make recommendations to the board on updates to the guidelines as necessary, but in no event fewer than once every four years.(4) Make recommendations to the board on relevant policy 20250HB1200PN1641 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and implementation matters relating to inclusion and participation in this Commonwealth's regulated cannabis industry by social and economic equity applicants.(5) Conduct advertising and promotional campaigns and disseminate information to the public to increase awareness and promote inclusion and participation in this Commonwealth's regulated cannabis industry by social and economic equity applicants.(6) Sponsor webinars, seminars and other informational programs regarding the board's programs relating to social and economic equity and provide information on the office's publicly accessible Internet website.(7) Administer the Social and Economic Equity Loan and Grant Program established under section 604.(8) Establish and implement workforce development and recruiting and retention strategies for potential cannabis store employees from historically impacted communities.(9) Establish resources for cannabis entities and the board on workforce development, recruitment and retention strategies of employees from historically impacted communities.(d) Review of participation efforts.--As part of its duties under subsection (c)(4), the office:(1) Shall conduct ongoing reviews of policies and procedures implemented by the board related to inclusion and participation in this Commonwealth's regulated cannabis industry by social and economic equity applicants.(2) May consult with experts or other knowledgeable individuals and groups in the public and private sectors and industry stakeholders on any aspect of the office's powers 20250HB1200PN1641 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and duties under this section.(e) Report.--Within two years of presentation to the board of guidelines under subsection (c)(2), and on a biennial basis thereafter, the office shall submit a report to the General Assembly that addresses inclusion and participation in this Commonwealth's regulated cannabis industry by social and economic equity applicants. At a minimum, the report shall include:(1) The number of licenses, permits, registrations, certificates and other authorizations to engage in a regulated activity under this act issued by the board compared to the number of social and economic equity applicants that applied.(2) The number of social and economic equity applicants that the board certified as certified social and economic equity applicants compared to the number that applied.(3) The number of certified social and economic equity applicants that were granted licenses compared to the number that were denied.(4) Recommendations for new types of permits, registrations, certifications or other authorizations that could benefit potential social and economic equity applicants or the regulated cannabis industry.(5) Recommendations for outreach to potential social and economic equity applicants to participate in the regulated cannabis industry, including indirect cannabis businesses.(6) The number of certified social and economic equity applicants, certified social and economic equity licensees and indirect cannabis businesses receiving financial assistance under this chapter.20250HB1200PN1641 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) The aggregate amount of grant assistance awarded to certified social and economic equity applicants, certified social and economic equity licensees and indirect cannabis businesses in the aggregate under this chapter.(8) The number and amount of loans made to certified social and economic equity applicants, certified social and economic equity licensees and indirect cannabis businesses, and the amount of loans made that are outstanding under this chapter.(9) The number of new jobs and other forms of economic development created as a result of the financial assistance awarded under this chapter.(10) Activity of the social equity advisory committees.Section 602.1. Social and Economic Equity Advisory Committee.(a) Establishment.--The Social and Economic Equity Advisory Committee is established.(b) Membership.--The committee shall be composed of the following:(1) The director of the office, who shall serve as chair.(2) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services, or their designee.(3) The chairman of the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency, or their designee.(4) The director of the Office of Health Equity, or their designee.(5) Two individuals who were previously incarcerated for an offense that is eligible to be vacated under this act, appointed by the chair of the Pennsylvania Parole Board.(6) Two individuals who, when appointed, resided in a 20250HB1200PN1641 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 census tract with a higher rate of arrests for offenses involving cannabis than the Statewide average, appointed by the Lieutenant Governor.(7) An individual with expertise in the harms caused by cannabis criminalization, appointed by the Attorney General.(8) An individual appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate.(9) An individual appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(10) An individual appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.(11) An individual appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(c) Duties.--The committee shall advise the office on:(1) The establishment of guidelines to identify historically impacted communities and determine if an individual is a member of a historically impacted community.(2) Outreach to historically impacted communities.(3) All other duties of the office.(d) Reimbursement of expenses.--The members of the committee shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.(e) Term.--The terms of the advisory committee are as follows:(1) The term of members appointed under subsection (b)(1), (2), (3) and (4) shall be concurrent with the term of the public office or duration of service in the public office from which they derive their membership.(2) Members appointed under subsection (b)(5), (6), (7), 20250HB1200PN1641 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall serve for a four-year term and may be appointed for no more than one additional consecutive term.(3) Members appointed under subsection(b) (8), (9), (10) and (11) shall serve for a three-year term and may be appointed for no more than one additional consecutive term.(f) Meetings.--The committee shall meet at least six times a year.Section 603. Cannabis Business Development Fund.(a) Establishment of fund.--The Cannabis Business Development Fund is established as a fund within the State Treasury.(b) Use.--Money in the fund shall be held separate and apart from all other Commonwealth money and shall be used exclusively for administering the Social and Economic Equity Loan and Grant Program under section 604.(c) Prohibition.--The fund and money in the fund shall not be subject to transfer or any other fiscal or budgetary maneuver which would transfer or appropriate money in the fund into any other fund, account or Commonwealth program funded through the State Treasury or by any other Commonwealth agency or which may be established by the General Assembly.Section 604. Social and Economic Equity Loan and Grant Program.(a) Establishment.--The office, in consultation with the Department of Community and Economic Development, shall:(1) Establish an education and training program for social and economic equity applicants and potential applicants seeking to participate in this Commonwealth's regulated cannabis industry or provide services as an indirect cannabis business.(2) Establish a grant and low-interest loan program 20250HB1200PN1641 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 which shall be called the Social and Economic Loan and Grant Program to provide financial assistance to certified social and economic equity applicants, certified social and economic equity licensees and indirect cannabis businesses that meet the qualifications of a social and economic equity applicant.(3) Develop criteria for a certified social and economic equity applicant to apply and, as appropriate, receive conditional approval of a grant or low-interest loan. The awarding of a grant or low-interest loan shall be contingent upon the certified social and economic equity applicant being approved for a cannabis entity license by the board.(4) Develop financial, technical, marketing and business development training programs to assist certified social and economic equity applicants, certified social and economic equity licensees and indirect businesses that meet the qualifications of a social and economic equity applicant in gaining entry to, and successfully operating in the Commonwealth's regulated cannabis industry.(5) Collaborate with the Department of Agriculture in developing agriculture-specific programs for certified social and economic equity applicants and certified social and economic equity licensees on sustainable cultivation and crop production measures and activities.(6) On a continuing basis, collaborate with the Department of Agriculture and any other Commonwealth agency to secure the services of employees to provide guidance and assistance in carrying out the requirements of this chapter. The Department of Agriculture, the Department of Community and Economic Development and Commonwealth agencies shall cooperate with the office and the board in carrying out the 20250HB1200PN1641 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements of this paragraph.(7) Consult with the Attorney General to initiate actions which may be necessary to protect the interest of the Commonwealth in the event of bankruptcy, default, foreclosure or noncompliance with the terms and conditions of a loan or grant made under this section, including the ability to recapture money if the recipient is found to be noncompliant with the terms and conditions of a financial assistance agreement. The board may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Office of Attorney General to carry out the purposes of this paragraph.(8) Establish application, notification, contract and other forms, procedures or rules deemed necessary and appropriate to carry out the requirements of this section.(9) Utilize vendors or enter into contracts with persons to carry out the purposes of this section.(b) Social and economic equity loans.--A loan made under this section:(1) May only be made, if, in the judgment of the office, in consultation with the Department of Community and Economic Development, the loan furthers inclusion and participation by certified social and economic equity applicants and certified social and economic equity licensees in this Commonwealth's regulated cannabis industry.(2) Shall be in a principal amount and form and contain terms and provisions with respect to security, insurance, reporting, delinquency charges, default remedies and other matters as the office, in consultation with the Department of Community and Economic Development, determines appropriate to protect the public interest and be consistent with the 20250HB1200PN1641 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 purposes of this section.(3) May be conditionally approved contingent upon an applicant being selected by the board to receive a license or other approval from the board, or upon any other future action by or on behalf of the applicant conditionally approved for the loan. A conditionally approved loan shall be considered by the board when selecting applicants for licensure.(4) May include loans for gap financing, soft loans and predevelopment.(c) Social and economic equity grants.--(1) Grants authorized and awarded under this section shall be awarded on a competitive basis and shall be in amounts and forms necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter as determined by the office.(2) Grants may be:(i) conditioned upon the award, grant or issuance of a license, permit other authorization to engage in regulated activity under this act; and(ii) conditionally approved contingent upon an applicant being selected by the board to receive a license or other approval from the board, or upon any other future action by or on behalf of the applicant conditionally approved for the grant.(3) A conditionally approved grant shall be considered by the board when selecting applicants for licensure.(d) Certain community outreach required.--The office, in collaboration with the board and in consultation with the Department of Community and Economic Development, shall develop culturally and linguistically appropriate activities designed to 20250HB1200PN1641 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facilitate, promote and include engagement with individuals with limited English proficiency in all programs and outreach undertaken to support, engage, target and otherwise attract social and economic equity applicants to participate in this Commonwealth's regulated cannabis industry.CHAPTER 7LICENSE, PERMIT OR OTHER AUTHORIZATIONSUBCHAPTER AGENERAL PROVISIONSSection 701. Ineligibility for licensure, permit or other authorization.The following persons shall not be eligible for a license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act, except in extraordinary circumstances as determined by the board:(1) An applicant that has been convicted of an offense related to the functions or duties of owning or operating a business within three years of the application date, except that if the board determines that the applicant is otherwise suitable to be issued a license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act and that granting the license, permit or other authorization is not inconsistent with public safety, the board shall conduct a thorough review of the nature of the crime and conviction, the circumstances surrounding the crime and evidence of rehabilitation of the applicant and evaluate the suitability of the applicant based on the evidence found through the review. In determining which disqualifying convictions substantially relate to the functions or duties of owning or operating a cannabis entity, the board's 20250HB1200PN1641 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determination shall include, but not be limited to, the following:(i) a felony conviction within the past three years involving fraud, money laundering, forgery, human trafficking and other unlawful conduct related to owning or operating a business, including the business for which the applicant is seeking board authorization; and(ii) a felony conviction within the past three years for hiring, employing or using a minor in transporting, carrying, selling, giving away or preparing for sale any controlled substance to a minor or other person or selling, offering to sell, furnishing, offering to furnish, administering or giving any controlled substance to a minor or other person.(2) A partnership or a corporation, unless each member of the partnership or each of the principal officers and directors or other essential employees of the corporation is a citizen of the United States. A corporation which otherwise conforms to the requirements of this act may be issued a license, permit or other authorization if each of the corporation's principal officers and more than one-half of the directors or other essential employees of the corporation are citizens of the United States.(3) (Reserved).(4) A person that had a license, permit or other authorization issued by the board revoked for cause.(5) A person that does not hold a license, permit or other authorization under this act and has been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony in violation of this act, until the expiration of a five-year period from the date of the 20250HB1200PN1641 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sentence for the conviction.(6) A corporation or partnership, if a principal, officer, director, essential employee or partner, while not authorized to hold a license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act, has been convicted of a misdemeanor or felony in violation of this act or, if required to hold a license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act, has had the license, permit or other authorization revoked for cause, until the expiration of a five-year period from the date of the conviction or revocation as determined by the board.Section 702. Renewals.(a) Renewal required.--(1) Licenses, permits and other authorizations to engage in a regulated activity under this act issued under this chapter are subject to renewal every three years.(2) The application for renewal shall be submitted at least 90 days prior to the expiration of the license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act and shall include an update of the information and plans contained in the initial application, prior renewal applications and the payment of the renewal fee.(3) In addition to any other conditions or requirements established by the board for renewal, the board shall require an applicant for renewal to submit proof of adherence to plans to hire justice-involved individuals, members of an impacted family or members of a historically impacted community submitted to the board as part of its initial application and the license's adherence to and continuation 20250HB1200PN1641 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of a labor peace agreement. Absent sufficient proof of adherence to and continuation of the plan or agreement, the board shall deny the renewal application or conditionally approve or defer action on the renewal application and require the applicant for renewal to develop and submit a corrective action plan to the board. No less than one year after submission of the corrective action plan, the board shall require the applicant to demonstrate actions taken to correct their failure to adhere to or continue the plan or agreement and specific actions taken under the corrective action plan. Nothing shall prevent the board from denying an application for renewal based solely upon a failure to adhere to or continue a plan or agreement.(4) Nothing under this subsection relieves a licensee, permittee or holder of other authorization of the affirmative duty to notify the board of any changes relating to the status of the license, permit, certificate, registration or other authorization or to any other information contained in the application materials on file with the board.(b) Sanctions authorized.--(1) In addition to any other sanctions the board may impose under this act, the board may suspend, deny, condition or revoke or deny renewal of any license, permit, certification, registration or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act if the board determines that the person seeking renewal or a principal or essential employee of the person is in violation of any provision of this act, that the person has furnished the board with false or misleading information or that the information contained in the person's initial application or 20250HB1200PN1641 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any renewal application is no longer true and correct.(2) In the event of a suspension, the person's authorization to conduct the previously approved regulated activity shall immediately cease until the board has notified the person that the suspension is no longer in effect.(3) In the event of a revocation or failure to renew, the person's authorization to conduct the previously approved regulated activity shall immediately cease, and all fees paid shall be deemed to be forfeited.Section 703. Construction.Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to create an entitlement to a license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act by any person. The board shall, in the board's sole discretion, issue, renew, condition or deny a cannabis entity license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act based upon the requirements under this act and whether the issuance of a license, permit or other authorization will protect public health, promote equity, enhance economic development or job creation, is in the best interests of this Commonwealth and advances the intent and purposes of this act.SUBCHAPTER BCANNABIS ENTITY LICENSESSection 704. Cannabis entity license application.(a) Submission.--(1) Each applicant for a cannabis entity license shall submit to the board:(i) An application on a form, in the manner and at the time established by the board.(ii) The applicable application fee.20250HB1200PN1641 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A cannabis entity license may not be issued by the board until after the completion of a background investigation of the applicant and its principals, essential employees and other employees as required by the board.(b) Application requirements.--In addition to any other information required under this act or regulation of the board, the application for any type of cannabis entity license shall include, at a minimum:(1) Information about the applicant, each principal, person with a financial interest and any person who participates directly or indirectly in the control, management or operation of the cannabis entity.(2) The Federal and State tax identification numbers of the applicant and proof of registration with the Department of Revenue.(3) Proof that the applicant is in compliance with the requirements of section 1104.(4) The applicant's business plan or management operation profile.(5) The applicant's operation plan, including a description of the secure facility or area where cannabis will be stored, cultivated, processed or sold, inventory and packaging plans, policies and procedures for energy efficiency and conservation.(6) Emergency procedures, including a disaster plan with procedures to be followed in case of fire or other emergency, including a proclamation of a disaster or public health emergency.(7) A plan to obtain appropriate liability insurance coverage for the proposed cannabis establishment.20250HB1200PN1641 - 84 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) (Reserved).(9) The details of a cannabis entity license or similar license, permit or other authorization applied for, granted to or denied to the applicant in another jurisdiction, foreign or domestic, where the personal use of cannabis and cannabis products or medical marijuana is legal or regulated, and the consent for the board to acquire copies of the application submitted or license, permit or other authorization granted to the applicant in the other jurisdiction.(10) The details of loans:(i) obtained by an applicant from a financial institution; and(ii) not approved by a financial institution.(11) The consent to a background investigation, the scope of which shall be determined by the board and a release signed by all individuals and principals subject to a background investigation agreeing to provide all information required by the board to complete the background investigation.(12) Payment of the applicable cannabis entity license fee.(13) The disclosure of any arrests.(14) The terms of a management service agreement entered into or proposed to be entered into between a cannabis entity applicant and another person, including the scope of services to be provided, the number and compensation of employees.(15) A list of any adverse actions taken against an applicant that holds or has held a permit to perform a regulated activity in a jurisdiction, foreign or domestic, 20250HB1200PN1641 - 85 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 where the use of cannabis flower and cannabis products or medical marijuana is legal or regulated.(16) A copy of the labor peace agreement required under section 714.(17) Proof of the applicant's financial fitness.(18) The applicant's previous business experience, if applicable.(19) A plan to hire justice-involved individuals, members of an impacted family or individuals who are a member of a historically impacted community.(c) Limitation.--An applicant may only submit one application per cannabis entity license type within a given licensing round.(d) Completed applications and updated information required.--(1) The board may not consider an incomplete application or an application that was submitted without the applicable application fee, unless the board has waived the fee.(2) The board must notify the applicant in writing if an application is incomplete or an application fee was not submitted, who shall have 10 calendar days from the date of the deficiency notice to submit a complete application to the board.(3) Except as otherwise provided in this act, each cannabis entity shall be required to update the information in the cannabis entity's initial application within 30 days of any changes.(e) Cannabis entity fees.--(1) The board shall establish a schedule for the payment of fees by cannabis entities in the amounts required under 20250HB1200PN1641 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this chapter.(2) Except as provided under paragraph (4), each applicant for a cannabis entity license shall pay to the board, in the form, manner and time as prescribed by regulation of the board a nonrefundable application fee.(3) Except as provided under paragraph (4), each cannabis entity shall pay to the board, in the form, manner and time as prescribed by regulation of the board:(i) a license fee;(ii) a license renewal fee; and(iii) a monthly verification system fee.(4) The board may waive the application fees required under this section for certified social and economic equity applicants.(5) The board may impose and collect additional fees not specified in this section in accordance with the provisions of this act or by regulation of the board.(f) License and renewal fees for certified social and equity licensees.--The license and renewal fee for a certified social and economic equity licensee shall be 50% of the amount for the type of license applied for in accordance with the applicable provisions of this act or may be waived by the board.(g) Health and safety standards.--The board:(1) Shall require each cannabis entity to meet all public health and safety standards and industry best practices required by the board and all applicable regulations established by the board on the cannabis entity's specific authorization and requirements related to cannabis, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia under this subchapter.20250HB1200PN1641 - 87 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) May:(i) Collaborate with the Department of Agriculture and the Department of Health in developing the public health and safety standards and industry best practices required under paragraph (1).(ii) In consultation with the Department of Agriculture and the Department of Health, review and evaluate for use in this Commonwealth the health and safety standards and industry best practices adopted by other states or jurisdictions to govern the use of cannabis, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia for personal use.Section 705. Scoring system, lottery system and issuance.(a) Development of scoring system.--(1) The board shall, by regulation, develop a scoring system under which applications for a Category 1 cannabis cultivator license or a Category 1 cannabis processor license are administratively ranked and scored based on the clarity, organization and quality of the information provided in the application for licensure. The scoring system shall be based upon a point scale with the board determining the point categories, number of points for each category, and the system of point distribution.(2) When developing the scoring system, the board shall consider an applicant's potential impact on the following:(i) Creation of quality, living-wage jobs and full-time permanent jobs.(ii) Economic development.(iii) The use of organized labor in construction of the cannabis entity's facility.20250HB1200PN1641 - 88 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Inclusion and participation in the regulated cannabis industry by members of historically impacted communities, justice-involved individuals or members of an impacted family.(v) Equality of opportunity in employment and contracting.(b) Ranking.--The board:(1) Shall rank applications, from the most to the least points, according to the scoring system.(2) If two or more eligible applicants have the same number of points, those applicants shall be grouped together and, if there are more eligible applicants in this group than the remaining number of licenses available, the board may increase the number of the Category 1 cultivator and Category 1 processor licenses as provided for under section 712.(3) Shall award bonus points to applicants that are certified social and economic equity applicants.(4) May award bonus points to applicants that submit a plan to have 51% of their workforce be comprised of justice-involved individuals, members of an impacted family, and members of a historically impacted community.(c) Lottery system.--The board shall:(1) Establish by regulation a lottery system for Category 2 cannabis microcultivator licenses, Category 2 cannabis microprocessor licenses, transporter licenses and on-site consumption licenses. (2) In addition to the requirements set forth in section 704(b), establish an application with eligibility requirements that the board will grade on a pass/fail basis.(3) Enter applications that pass under paragraph (2) 20250HB1200PN1641 - 89 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 into the lottery.(4) Award licenses in at least two separate rounds, the first of which may only consist of certified social and economic equity applicants.(5) Establish a goal to award 50% of Category 2 cannabis microcultivator licenses, Category 2 cannabis microprocessor licenses, transporter licenses and on-site consumption licenses to certified social and economic equity applicants.(6) Of the percentage of certified social and economic equity licenses awarded under paragraph (5), establish a goal to award 50% to certified social and economic equity applicants who are justice-involved individuals or members of an impacted family.(d) Deposit of license and renewal fee.--The total amount of all license and renewal fees imposed and collected by the board under this chapter shall be deposited into the Cannabis Revenue Fund.(e) Term.--A cannabis entity license shall be in effect unless suspended, revoked or not renewed by the board upon good cause shown.(f) License regions.--The board shall issue cannabis entity licenses to applicants in a manner ensuring that each of the regions established under section 404(d)(2) receives licenses proportional to the region's population with each region being issued at least one each of each kind of cannabis entity license.Section 706. Licensing of principals required.(a) License required.--All principals shall obtain a principal license from the board.(b) Application.--Upon application for a cannabis entity 20250HB1200PN1641 - 90 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license, all principals shall submit an application for a principal license. A principal license application shall be in a form prescribed by the board and shall include the following:(1) Verification of status of the person as a principal from the applicant or cannabis entity.(2) Job title or a description of the person's responsibilities as a principal.(3) All releases necessary to obtain information from governmental agencies, employers and other organizations as required by the board.(4) Fingerprints, which shall be submitted to the Pennsylvania State Police if not submitted with the application for a cannabis entity license.(5) A photograph that meets the standards of the Commonwealth Photo Imaging Network.(6) Details relating to a similar license, permit or other authorization granted to the person in another jurisdiction, foreign or domestic.(7) Any information required by the board to complete the required background investigation.(8) Additional information as may be required by the board.(c) Issuance.--(1) Following review of the application and the receipt and review of the background investigation, the board may issue a principal license if the applicant has proven by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant is a person of good character, honesty and integrity and is eligible and suitable to be licensed as a principal.(2) Each license issued to a principal under this 20250HB1200PN1641 - 91 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section shall include a unique alphanumeric principal employee number.(d) Nontransferability.--A principal license may not be transfered.(e) Essential employee registration exemption.--An individual who is issued a principal license does not need to obtain an essential employee registration under section 715.Section 707. Cannabis cultivator licenses.(a) Category 1 cultivator and Category 2 microcultivator authorization.--A cannabis cultivator license authorizes a Category 1 cultivator licensee and a Category 2 cannabis microcultivator licensee to acquire, cultivate, possess, package and deliver and, subject to subsection (h), sell cannabis, cannabis flower and cannabis seeds.(b) Prohibitions.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (3), a person may not hold a legal, equitable, ownership or beneficial interest, directly or indirectly, or participate in the management of more than one cannabis cultivator licensee under this act.(2) A cannabis cultivator license may not be issued, transferred, owned or otherwise change control to a person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or trust or an intermediary, subsidiary, holding company, affiliate or any other form of business entity that holds, owns or controls a cannabis entity license or other authorization under this chapter.(3) An individual, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or trust or an intermediary, subsidiary, holding company, affiliate or any other form of business 20250HB1200PN1641 - 92 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 entity that holds, owns or controls one cultivator license may hold, own or control a total of one processor license.(c) Application and eligibility requirements.--In addition to the requirements under section 704 and the scoring and lottery systems under section 705:(1) A person applying for a Category 1 cannabis cultivator license shall:(i) Submit to the board in the time and in the manner determined by the board a completed application and a nonrefundable application fee of $5,000.(ii) Consent to the conduct of a background investigation of the applicant and its principals, essential employees and other employees as required by the board.(iii) Satisfy all other requirements for application and licensure under this act and regulations of the board promulgated under this act.(iv) Have relevant knowledge and expertise necessary as determined by the board.(2) A person applying for a Category 2 microcultivator license:(i) Shall submit to the board in the time and in the manner determined by the board a completed application and a nonrefundable application fee of $2,500.(ii) Consent to the conduct of a background investigation of the applicant and its principals, essential employees and other employees as required by the board.(iii) Satisfy all other requirements for application and licensure under this act and regulations of the board 20250HB1200PN1641 - 93 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 promulgated under this act.(iv) Must meet the following requirements:(A) The applicant employs or will employ no more than 10 employees.(B) The applicant has relevant knowledge and expertise necessary, as determined by the board.(d) Number of licenses.--Except as provided in section 712, the board shall issue:(1) 50 Category 1 cannabis cultivator licenses.(2) 50 Category 2 cannabis microcultivator licenses.(e) Licensing tier system.--(1) Prior to accepting applications, the board shall adopt a licensing tier system for the issuance of Category 1 cannabis cultivators and Category 2 cannabis microcultivators based on total square footage of indoor and outdoor cannabis grow canopy. The licensing tier system for a Category 1 cannabis cultivator shall at a minimum include 10 tiers. The licensing tier system for a Category 2 cannabis microcultivator shall at a minimum include five tiers.(2) The following apply:(i) A cannabis cultivator may submit an application, in the form, manner and time determined by the board, to expand or reduce the licensing tier type under which it is classified.(ii) In determining whether or not to expand or reduce the licensing tier type of a cannabis cultivator, the board may authorize an increase or decrease of cannabis cultivator's grow canopy. The board may authorize an increase in a cannabis cultivator's cannabis flowering stage cultivation space in increments of 3,000 20250HB1200PN1641 - 94 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 square feet based on:(A) Market demand.(B) The cannabis cultivator's ability to increase space.(C) The cannabis cultivator's history of compliance or noncompliance with this act and regulations of the board.(3) In its review of an application to renew a Category 1 cannabis cultivator license, the board shall analyze the cultivation records of the cannabis cultivator. The board may reduce the licensee's maximum cannabis grow canopy to a lower licensing tier if it finds that the cannabis cultivator has sold less than 70% of the cannabis it cultivated during the one year period proceeding the application for renewal. The board may take into account whether the cannabis cultivator has an indoor or outdoor cannabis grow canopy when making this determination.(4) In its review of an application to renew a Category 2 cannabis microcultivator license, the board shall analyze the cultivation records of the cannabis microcultivator. The board may reduce the licensee's maximum cannabis grow canopy if it finds that the cannabis cultivator has sold less than 70% of the cannabis it cultivated during the one year period proceeding the application for renewal, but the board may not reduce cannabis grow canopy below 5,000 square feet. The board may take into account whether the cannabis cultivator has an indoor or outdoor cannabis grow canopy when making this determination.(f) License and renewal fees.--(1) The board shall use the licensing tier system 20250HB1200PN1641 - 95 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adopted under subsection (e)(1) to determine the license and renewal fees for Category 1 cannabis cultivators and, subject to the following:(i) Each applicant for a Category 1 cannabis cultivators license shall designate the tier at which the applicant requests to be initially licensed in the application under subsection (c)(1).(ii) The licensing fee imposed by the board under each Category 1 cannabis cultivator licensing tier shall be calculated by multiplying the total square feet of indoor or outdoor cannabis grow canopy used or proposed to be used by the applicant or cannabis cultivator by $1.50.(iii) The licensing renewal fee imposed by the board under each Category 1 cannabis cultivators licensing tier shall be calculated by multiplying the total square feet of indoor and outdoor cannabis grow canopy used or proposed to be used by the applicant or Category 1 cannabis cultivator by $0.75.(2) The board shall use the licensing tier system adopted under subsection (e)(1) to determine the license and renewal fees for Category 2 cannabis microcultivators, subject to the following:(i) Each applicant for a Category 2 cannabis microcultivator license shall designate the tier at which the applicant requests to be initially licensed in the application under subsection (c)(2).(ii) The licensing fee imposed by the board under each Category 2 cannabis microcultivator licensing tier shall be calculated by multiplying the total square feet 20250HB1200PN1641 - 96 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of indoor and outdoor cannabis grow canopy used or proposed to be used by the applicant by $0.50.(iii) The licensing renewal fee imposed by the board under each category 2 cannabis microcultivator licensing tier shall be calculated by multiplying the total square feet of indoor and outdoor cannabis grow canopy used or proposed to be used by the Category 2 cannabis microcultivator by $0.25.(g) Grow canopies.--(1) A Category 1 cannabis cultivator's cannabis establishment may contain up to 125,000 square feet of cannabis grow canopy for plants in the cannabis flowering stage.(2) (i) At the time of initial licensure, a Category 2 cannabis microcultivator's cannabis establishment may contain up to 5,000 square feet of cannabis grow canopy for plants in the cannabis flowering stage.(ii) If the board authorizes an increase to a Category 2 cannabis microcultivator's cannabis grow canopy, the maximum cannabis grow canopy for cultivating cannabis plants in the cannabis flowering stage may not exceed 14,000 square feet.(3) The cultivation of cannabis plants in any stage of growth must be cultivated in a secure facility or area of the cannabis cultivator's cannabis establishment.(h) Sale of cannabis.--(1) A Category 1 cannabis cultivator may sell:(i) Cannabis to:(A) A Category 1 cannabis cultivator or a Category 2 cannabis microcultivator.20250HB1200PN1641 - 97 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) A Category 1 cannabis processor or a Category 2 cannabis microprocessor.(ii) Cannabis seeds and cannabis flower to the board.(2) A Category 2 cannabis microcultivator may sell:(i) Cannabis to:(A) A Category 1 cannabis cultivator or a Category 2 cannabis microcultivator.(B) A Category 1 cannabis processor or a Category 2 cannabis microprocessor.(ii) Cannabis seeds and cannabis flower to the board.(i) Duties of board.--The board, by regulation, shall require:(1) Cannabis cultivated or otherwise produced by a cannabis cultivator to be tested in accordance with this act.(2) Cannabis cultivators to submit an annual report describing the licensee's electrical and water usage at the licensee's cannabis establishment during the preceding calendar year.(3) Cannabis cultivators to meet all public health and safety standards, industry best practices and all applicable regulations established by the board related to the cultivation of cannabis, including the propagation or cloning of immature cannabis plants and seeds.(j) Authorization.--A cannabis cultivator may do the following:(1) Obtain and transport seed and immature plant material from outside this Commonwealth during at least one 30-day period per year as designated by the board to 20250HB1200PN1641 - 98 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 grow cannabis.(2) Obtain seed and immature plant material from a medical marijuana organization licensed under the Medical Marijuana Act or another cannabis cultivator.(3) Package cannabis seed and cannabis flower to be sold directly to the board as subject to the requirements set by the board and this act.Section 708. Cannabis processor licenses.(a) Category 1 cannabis processor and Category 2 microprocessor authorization.--A cannabis processor license authorizes a Category 1 cannabis processor licensee and a Category 2 cannabis microprocessor licensee to acquire, possess, dry and cure cannabis from a cannabis cultivator or cannabis microcultivator and process, including package, cannabis into cannabis flower and cannabis products for sale under subsection (e).(b) Prohibitions.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (3), a person may not hold a legal, equitable, ownership or beneficial interest, directly or indirectly, or participate in the management of more than one cannabis processor license under this act.(2) A cannabis processor license may not be issued, transferred, owned or otherwise change control to a person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or trust or an intermediary, subsidiary, holding company, affiliate or any other form of business entity that holds, owns or controls a cannabis entity license or other authorization under this chapter.(3) An individual, partnership, corporation, limited 20250HB1200PN1641 - 99 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 liability company or trust or an intermediary, subsidiary, holding company, affiliate or any other form of business entity that holds, owns or controls one processor license may hold, own or control a total of one cultivator license.(c) Application and eligibility requirements.--In addition to the requirements under section 704:(1) A person applying for a Category 1 cannabis processor license shall:(i) Submit to the board in the time and in the manner determined by the board a completed application and a nonrefundable application fee of $5,000.(ii) Consent to the conduct of a background investigation of the applicant and its principals, essential employees and other employees as required by the board.(iii) Satisfy all other requirements for application and licensure under this act and regulations of the board promulgated under this act.(iv) Have relevant knowledge and expertise necessary, as determined by the board.(2) A person applying for a Category 2 microprocessor license:(i) Shall submit to the board in the time and in the manner determined by the board a completed application and a nonrefundable application fee of $2,500.(A) The applicant employs or will employ no more than 10 employees.(B) The applicant has relevant knowledge and expertise necessary, as determined by the board.(ii) Consent to the conduct of a background 20250HB1200PN1641 - 100 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 investigation of the applicant and its principals, essential employees and other employees as required by the board.(iii) Satisfy all other requirements for application and licensure under this act and regulations of the board.(d) Number of licenses.--Except as provided in 712, the board shall issue:(1) 50 Category 1 cannabis processor licenses.(2) 50 Category 2 cannabis microprocessor licenses.(e) Fees.--(1) The license fee for a Category 1 cannabis processor shall be $50,000.(2) The license fee for a Category 2 cannabis microprocessor shall be $15,000.(3) The renewal fee for a Category 1 cannabis processor shall be $25,000.(4) The renewal fee for a Category 2 cannabis microprocessor shall be $7,500.(f) Sale of cannabis.--(1) A Category 1 cannabis processor may sell cannabis flower, cannabis products to:(i) A Category 1 cannabis processor.(ii) A Category 2 cannabis microprocessor.(iii) The board.(2) A Category 2 cannabis microprocessor may sell cannabis flower, cannabis products to:(i) A Category 1 cannabis processor.(ii) A Category 2 cannabis microprocessor.(iii) The board.20250HB1200PN1641 - 101 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 709. Cannabis transporter license.(a) Authorization and prohibitions.--(1) A cannabis transporter license authorizes a person to transport cannabis, cannabis flower and cannabis products in this Commonwealth:(i) from one cannabis entity to another cannabis entity as provided under this act; and(ii) to the board.(2) A person applying for or holding a cannabis transporter license may not have a direct or indirect interest, including by stock ownership, interlocking directors, mortgage or lien, personal or real property or other means, in a medical marijuana organization.(3) A person may not have a direct or indirect financial or controlling interest in more than one cannabis transporter license issued under this act.(4) A cannabis transporter license may not be issued, transferred, owned or otherwise change in control to a person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or trust or an intermediary, subsidiary, holding company, affiliate or any other form of business entity that holds, owns or controls any other type of cannabis entity license or permit.(b) Application.--In addition to the requirements under section 704(b), an application for a transporter license must require the applicant to satisfy any other requirements for the application and licensure under this act and regulations of the board.(c) Number of licenses.--Except as provided in section 712, the board may issue up to 50 cannabis transporter licenses.20250HB1200PN1641 - 102 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Fees.--(1) An application for a cannabis transporter license shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable application fee of $5,000.(2) The license fee for a transporter license shall be $10,000.(3) A cannabis transporter in good standing shall pay a $2,500 license renewal fee.(e) Duties of board.--In addition to the board's regulatory authority, the board, by regulation, shall require a cannabis transporter to meet all public health and safety standards, industry best practices and all applicable regulations established by the board related to the transportation of cannabis, cannabis flower and cannabis products.Section 710. On-site consumption license.(a) Authorization and prohibitions.--(1) A cannabis on-site consumption license authorizes a cannabis on-site consumption licensee to:(i) (A) Subject to clause (B), operate a single on-site consumption premises on which cannabis flower or cannabis products may be sold and consumed by individuals 21 years of age or older in accordance with this act and any regulations adopted under this act.(B) Cannabis flower and cannabis products may not be smoked indoors.(ii) Purchase cannabis flower and cannabis products from the board and sell an amount of cannabis flower or cannabis products to an individual 21 years of age or older for on-site consumption in amounts authorized by 20250HB1200PN1641 - 103 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the board.(iii) Purchase low-dose cannabis from the board and sell low-dose cannabis to an individual 21 years of age or older for off-site consumption.(2) A cannabis on-site consumption licensee may not hold more than one cannabis on-site consumption license.(3) A cannabis on-site consumption licensee may not be issued, transferred, owned or otherwise change in control to a person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or trust or an intermediary, subsidiary, holding company, affiliate or any other form of business entity that holds, owns or controls any other type of cannabis entity license or permit.(b) Age verification required.--(1) Except as provided under paragraph (2), each on-site consumption licensee must utilize a scan device for a valid photo driver's license or identification card issued by the Department of Transportation or by any other state to verify the age of each individual attempting to enter an on-site consumption premises and purchase cannabis flower or cannabis product before making a sale.(2) A valid Canadian driver's license or other bona fide Canadian identification such as a Canadian-issued passport, or a valid Armed Forces of the United States identification card, a valid passport or a travel visa issued by the United States or a foreign country that contains the holder's photograph shall, for the purpose of this act, be accepted as an identification card.(c) Requirements.--An applicant for a cannabis on-site consumption license shall satisfy all other requirements for 20250HB1200PN1641 - 104 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 licensure as a cannabis entity under this act and regulations of the board, including consent to a background investigation as determined by the board.(d) Number of licenses.--Except as provided in section 712, the board may issue up to 100 on-site consumption licenses.(e) Fees.--(1) The nonrefundable application fee for a cannabis on-site consumption license is $5,000.(2) The license fee for a cannabis on-site consumption license is $10,000.(3) An on-site consumption licensee in good standing shall pay a $5,000 renewal fee.(f) Local control.--An on-site consumption establishment may operate only if the municipality where the on-site consumption establishment is proposed to be located has passed an ordinance or resolution that expressly allows for the operation of the on-site consumption premises, and sets the number of on-site consumption premises permitted in the municipality.(g) Additional training required.--In addition to the cannabis responsible training under section 717, the board shall develop additional health and safety training requirements for employees of an on-site consumption licensee.(h) Prohibitions.--An on-site consumption licensee may not:(1) Distribute or allow the distribution of free samples of cannabis flower or cannabis products in the licensed cannabis establishment.(2) Allow the consumption of alcohol in the licensed cannabis establishment.(3) Allow the smoking of cannabis flower, cannabis products, tobacco or tobacco products inside the cannabis 20250HB1200PN1641 - 105 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 establishment.(4) Allow the use or consumption of cannabis flower or cannabis products by an individual 21 years of age or older who displays any visible signs of hallucinating or intoxication.(5) Admit onto the licensed premises an individual who is under the age of 21 years.(6) Sell low-dose cannabis for off-site consumption at hours earlier or later than a cannabis store.(7) Sell more cannabis flower or cannabis products for on-site consumption in an amount permitted by the board.(8) Sell low-dose cannabis for off-site consumption to an individual 21 years of age or older in an amount permitted by the board.(9) Except as permitted under subsection (a)(1)(iii), permit the removal cannabis flower or cannabis product from the licensed establishment.(10) Be located within 1,000 feet from an elementary school, secondary school or day care.(i) Requirements.--An on-site consumption licensee shall post signs and make available brochures in the same manner as a cannabis store as required under section 505.Section 711. (Reserved).Section 712. Need for additional licenses.In determining whether to exercise the board's authority to issue additional cannabis entity licenses under this chapter, the board shall consider the following:(1) The percentage of illicit cannabis flower and cannabis product sales occurring in this Commonwealth using data analyzed and compiled by the Pennsylvania State Police, 20250HB1200PN1641 - 106 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the United States Drug Enforcement Agency or any other Federal or State agency to ascertain the total illicit sales in this Commonwealth compared to the amount of sales of cannabis flower and cannabis products in cannabis stores and at on-site consumption premises.(2) Whether there is an adequate supply of cannabis flower and cannabis products to serve patients and caregivers under the Medical Marijuana Act and cannabis consumers under this act.(3) Whether there is an oversupply of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower and cannabis products in this Commonwealth, which could result in trafficking to another state or in the diversion of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower and cannabis products to illicit markets.(4) Population increases or shifts.(5) The number, density and location of cannabis entity licenses in this Commonwealth, including the number, density and location of cannabis entity licenses held by qualified social and economic equity licensees.(6) Actual or perceived security risks associated with increasing the number and location of cannabis entity licenses.(7) The past safety record of cannabis entities.(8) The board's ability to adequately regulate additional cannabis entities.(9) Findings or recommendations of the Office of Social and Economic Equity related to reducing or eliminating identified barriers to entry into this Commonwealth's regulated cannabis industry by social and economic equity applicants and residents of historically impacted 20250HB1200PN1641 - 107 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 communities.(10) Changes to Federal law.(11) Any other criteria the board may determine necessary and appropriate.Section 713. Change in ownership or control.(a) Notification and approval.--A cannabis entity shall notify the board in a manner determined by the board immediately upon becoming aware of any proposed or contemplated change in ownership or control of a cannabis entity licensee by any person.(b) Qualification of purchaser of cannabis entity license and change of control.--The purchaser of the assets, other than in the ordinary course of business, of a cannabis entity license shall independently qualify for a license as provided under this act and shall pay the license fee, except as otherwise required under this section. The license fee shall be paid upon the assignment and actual change of control or ownership of the cannabis entity license.(c) Fee reduction.--The board may eliminate the need for qualification and proportionately reduce, but not eliminate, the new license fee otherwise required under this section in connection with a change of ownership or control of a cannabis entity license, depending upon the type of transaction, the relevant ownership interests and changes to the ownership interests resulting from the transaction and other considerations deemed relevant by the board.(d) Transferability.--A cannabis entity licensee may not transfer or initiate a change in ownership or control of the cannabis entity license unless the cannabis entity licensee has received approval for renewal of the cannabis entity license at 20250HB1200PN1641 - 108 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 least twice.(e) Social and economic equity.--If a certified social and economic equity licensee seeks to transfer, sell or grant the licensee's cannabis entity license to a person that does not qualify as a certified social and economic equity applicant that meets the other requirements under this chapter, the agreement to transfer, sell or grant the cannabis entity license to another person shall include a requirement that the person receiving a cannabis entity license held by the certified social and economic equity licensee shall pay the board for deposit into the Cannabis Business Development Fund an amount equal to any outstanding loan, grant or waived fee issued by the board to the certified social and economic equity licensee.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Change in ownership or control." The consolidation, merger or acquisition by a person or group of persons acting in concert of more than 20% of a cannabis entity licensee's securities or other ownership interests, with the exception of any ownership interest of the person that existed at the time of initial licensing and payment of the initial cannabis entity license fee, or more than 20% of the securities or other ownership interests of a corporation or other form of business entity which owns directly or indirectly at least 20% of the voting or other securities or other ownership interests of the cannabis entity licensee.Section 714. Labor peace agreement.(a) Labor peace agreement required.--At the time of application for a cannabis entity license, an applicant must 20250HB1200PN1641 - 109 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 submit with its application a labor peace agreement signed by a bona fide labor organization and the applicant. The following apply:(1) A labor peace agreement shall be an ongoing material condition of an applicant being issued a license.(2) If an employer has entered into a collective bargaining agreement with a bona fide labor organization, attestation of the agreement shall be included in the application.(3) A cannabis entity licensee seeking renewal of a license that has not entered into a collective bargaining agreement with a bona fide labor organization shall submit an attestation of compliance of the initial agreement signed by the applicant and the bona fide labor organization which was party to the agreement. An applicant that has complied with the terms of a labor peace agreement and has not entered into an agreement with a bona fide labor organization shall not be required to enter into a new labor peace agreement for the purposes of renewal.(b) Compliance.--Failure to comply with the terms agreed to in the labor peace agreement for the entire duration of the agreement shall result in fines or denial, suspension or revocation of a license. The following apply:(1) The board shall determine a schedule establishing the ongoing review of the status and maintenance of a labor peace agreement to assess the eligibility of a license holder.(2) Upon review and findings of unsatisfactory status or the insufficient maintenance of a labor peace agreement, the board shall issue a fine or suspend the cannabis entity's 20250HB1200PN1641 - 110 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 license, or both.(3) Nothing in this section shall void the right of a bona fide labor organization to pursue a complaint of unfair labor practices in violation of Federal or State law with the the National Labor Relations Board or Pennsylvania Labor Relations Board.(4) An applicant or a cannabis entity licensee seeking renewal that the National Labor Relation Board or Pennsylvania Labor Relations Board has determined engaged in unfair labor practices in violation of a labor peace agreement or collective bargaining agreement shall be denied the issuance or renewal of a license.(5) Upon compliance with the terms of arbitration order issued by the National Labor Relations Board or Pennsylvania Labor Relations Board, and entry into a new labor peace agreement, an applicant shall be permitted the issuance of a license.(6) Where a majority of the employees of a cannabis entity license have voted to join a bona fide labor organization, failure to enter into a collective bargaining agreement within 200 days of the opening of a cannabis establishment may result in a referral to the National Labor Relations Board.(c) Applicability.--This section shall apply to the issuance of all licenses, including transfers and renewals.(d) Jurisdiction of Pennsylvania Labor Relations Board.--Except where preempted by Federal law, the Pennsylvania Labor Relations Board shall have jurisdiction over representation and unfair labor practices involving a cannabis entity.SUBCHAPTER C20250HB1200PN1641 - 111 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REGISTRATIONS, PERMITS AND CERTIFICATESSection 715. Registration of essential employees.(a) Registration required.--All essential employees must apply for and obtain an essential employee registration from the board.(b) Application.--Applications for registration as an essential employee shall be in a form prescribed by the board and shall include the following:(1) Verification of the essential employee's employment status by the applicant or cannabis entity.(2) Job title and a description of the essential employee's employment duties and responsibilities.(3) All releases necessary to obtain information from governmental agencies, former and current employers and other organizations or entities, as prescribed by the board.(4) Fingerprints, which shall be submitted to the Pennsylvania State Police.(5) A photograph that meets the standards of the Commonwealth Photo Imaging Network.(6) Details relating to a similar license, permit or other similar authorization obtained in another jurisdiction, foreign or domestic.(7) Additional information as may be required by the board.(c) Issuance.--(1) Following review of the application and the receipt and review of the background investigation, the board may issue an essential employee registration if the board determines the applicant is eligible and suitable to be registered as an essential employee.20250HB1200PN1641 - 112 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Each essential employee registration issued by the board shall include a unique alphanumeric essential employee registration number.(d) Registration not transferable.--An essential employee registration issued under this section is not transferable.Section 715.1. Workplace protections.(a) Conditions of licensure or any other authorization.--(1) A cannabis entity or any other entity authorized and regulated by the board under this act shall comply with all Federal, State and local occupational safety requirements and any occupational safety requirements promulgated by the board.(2) Upon a finding by the board of a violation under paragraph (1), the board may suspend, revoke, refuse to renew or issue a fine to a cannabis entity or any other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act.(b) Workplace safety study and recommendations.--(1) The Pennsylvania Occupation Safety and Health Surveillance Program, in consultation with the Department of Labor and Industry and the board, shall conduct a study to identify applicable OSHA standards that apply to the cannabis industry and offer recommendations for new standards that are needed to improve the health and safety of cannabis entity workplaces.(2) No later than January 1, 2027, the board shall send the findings of the study to the chair and minority chair of the Labor and Industry Committee of the Senate and the Labor and Industry Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 716. Required reports.(a) Social and economic equity report.--20250HB1200PN1641 - 113 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) On the first December 31, at least one year after the effective date of this paragraph, and on December 31 of each year thereafter, or upon request by the board, each cannabis entity shall report to the board, on a form and in a manner provided by the board, information of a scope and sufficiency that allows the board to:(i) assess the extent of social and economic equity inclusion and participation programs and activities in this Commonwealth's and regulated cannabis industry; and(ii) develop recommendations and measures to reduce or eliminate identified barriers to entry, including access to capital.(2) The information to be collected and reported shall identify updates on any activity described by a cannabis entity on their application to improve participation and inclusion in the regulated cannabis industry for individuals who qualify as a social and economic applicant.(b) Fine.--Failure to provide a report under subsection (a) may result in a fine as determined by the board.Section 717. Cannabis responsible training required.(a) Training required.--Within 45 days of the commencement of operations by the board or a cannabis entity, each manager, supervisor, employee, agent or other person employed by the board and each essential employee involved in the cultivation, processing, sale, transportation or handling of cannabis or cannabis products, as determined by regulation of the board, shall attend and complete a responsible cannabis training course.(b) Course curriculum.--The responsible cannabis training course shall include at least four hours of instruction time. 20250HB1200PN1641 - 114 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The course curriculum shall be designed to provide cannabis store and cannabis-entity-specific instruction applicable to the type of cannabis entity. The instruction shall include the following:(1) Health and safety issues related to the use of cannabis flower and cannabis products, including instruction on the physical and physiological effects of cannabis.(2) The responsible use of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia.(3) Quantity limitations on sales to cannabis consumers.(4) Safe storage of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia.(5) Compliance with all inventory tracking system regulations.(6) Waste handling, management and disposal.(7) Health, sanitation and safety standards.(8) Maintenance of records.(9) Security and surveillance requirements.(10) Required inspections, including random inspections.(11) Privacy and confidentiality requirements relating to cannabis consumers.(12) Packaging, processing and labeling requirements for sales to cannabis consumers.(13) Cultivation methods and the safe use and storage of chemicals, including pesticides, herbicides, compounds, fertilizers and other products.(14) The use, maintenance and storage of equipment and devices used in the cultivation, processing and sale or offering for sale of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower and cannabis products.20250HB1200PN1641 - 115 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (15) Any other subjects as prescribed by regulation of the board.(c) Certification.--Upon the successful completion of the responsible cannabis training program, the board shall deliver a certificate signifying an individual's successful completion of the course, either through United States Postal Service mail or electronically by email, to the individual and the cannabis store or entity employing the individual. The cannabis store or cannabis entity shall retain a copy of the course completion certificate for the duration of the individual's employment.(d) Failure to comply.--A cannabis entity whose employees are required to complete training under this section and fail to comply with this section may be subject to administrative sanction by the board.(e) Continuing education.--The board may adopt regulations to require continuing education on a prescribed schedule.Section 718. Cannabis workers' cooperative licensure.(a) Licenses.--In addition to the number of cannabis entity licenses allowed to be awarded under this act, two licenses for each type of cannabis entity category shall be awarded to an applicant that applies as a cannabis workers' cooperative. Nothing shall require the board to issue a license under this section if the applicant does not meet the requirements of this act or any regulation promulgated under this act or the applicable provisions of 15 Pa.C.S. (related to corporations and unincorporated associations) and any applicable regulation promulgated under to 15 Pa.C.S.(b) Applicability.--All requirements of this act and any regulation promulgated regarding application, licensure and compliance shall apply to a cannabis entity license issued to a 20250HB1200PN1641 - 116 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabis workers' cooperative.(c) Qualifications.--In addition to meeting the requirements of 15 Pa.C.S. Ch. 77 (relating to workers' cooperative corporations), the board shall establish additional qualifications for a cannabis workers' cooperative to ensure the cannabis worker cooperative is practicing the highest standards of worker governance, control and financial rights.(d) Failure to maintain a cannabis workers' cooperative.--If a cannabis workers' cooperative terminates its status as a workers' cooperative or fails to meet the requirements of this act or any regulation promulgated, the board may revoke or suspend the cannabis entity license that was awarded to the cannabis workers' cooperative.Section 719. Duty of licensees, permittees and other authorized persons.A person or employee of a person that is licensed, permitted or otherwise authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act shall have the duty to:(1) provide any assistance or information required by the board or the Pennsylvania State Police and to cooperate in any inquiry, investigation or hearing;(2) consent to inspections, searches and seizures;(3) inform the board of any actions which the person believe would constitute a violation of this part; and(4) inform the board of any arrests for any violations of offenses enumerated under this act, the Controlled Substances Act or 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses).Section 720. Exigent circumstance determination.(a) Award.--If, prior to the notice the board is required to 20250HB1200PN1641 - 117 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 give under section 405, the board determines that due to exigent circumstances, including insufficient product being available for sale at cannabis stores, and it being in the best interests of the Commonwealth to make the retail sale of cannabis and cannabis products available to cannabis consumers, the board may award one cannabis cultivator license, one cannabis processor license or both to a grower/processor.(b) License.--A grower/processor may apply for and be issued one cannabis cultivator license, one cannabis processor license or both.(c) Application.--(1) A grower/processor applying for a cannabis cultivator license, a cannabis processor license or both shall submit an application created by the board in a manner determined by the board. (2) The board shall require each grower/processor who applies to obtain a cannabis cultivator license, cannabis processor license or both to update the information in their applications submitted to the Department of Health under section 602 of the Medical Marijuana Act.(3) Upon submission of an application, the Department of Health shall provide the board with complete and unfettered access to all department records relating to any grower/processor who applies to obtain a cannabis cultivator license, a cannabis processor license or both.(4) No later than 30 days after a grower/processer applying for a license under this section has updated their information under paragraph (2), the board shall review the records and issue a license sought by a grower/processor subject to the limitations in subsection (b), so long as the 20250HB1200PN1641 - 118 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 grower/processor meets the requirements of the applicable license they are seeking under this act.(5) A grower/process applying for a cannabis cultivator license, a cannabis processor license or both shall pay a nonrefundable application fee of $15,000.(d) Licensing and renewal fees.--(1) A grower/processor shall pay a license fee of $20,000,000 for each license awarded under this section.(2) A cannabis cultivator license issued under this section shall be in addition to the number of licenses authorized under section 707. A cannabis processor license issued under this section shall be in addition to the number of licenses authorized under section 708.(e) Deposit of funds.--All licensing fees paid to the board under this section shall be deposited in the General Fund.(f) Definition.--For the purposes of this section, the term "grower/processor" shall have the same meaning as defined section 103 of the Medical Marijuana Act.CHAPTER 8PACKAGING, LABELING, ADVERTISING AND TESTINGSection 801. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Regulated cannabis." Cannabis seeds, cannabis flower and cannabis products cultivated, processed, sold or offered for sale in this Commonwealth as provided for under this act.Section 801.1. Packaging and labeling.(a) General rule.--The board shall adopt and promulgate regulations to govern:20250HB1200PN1641 - 119 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The advertising, branding, marketing, packaging and labeling of regulated cannabis, including rules pertaining to and governing the accuracy of information and the restriction of marketing and advertising to minors and other individuals under 21 years of age.(2) The advertising, branding, marketing, packaging and labeling of cannabis paraphernalia and other paraphernalia, including rules pertaining to and governing the accuracy of information and the restriction of marketing and advertising to minors and other individuals under 21 years of age.(b) Required regulations.--The regulations adopted and promulgated by the board under subsection (a) shall include, but not be limited to, requirements that:(1) The packaging of regulated cannabis conforms with the requirements of the Poison Prevention Packaging Act of 1970 (Public Law 91-601, 15 U.S.C. § 1471 et seq.).(2) Packaging of regulated cannabis sold or displayed for sale to cannabis consumers in multiple serving sizes shall meet the following requirements:(i) Packaging shall include the statement "INCLUDES MULTIPLE SERVINGS."(ii) Cannabis products in solid form shall be permanently scored in a manner in which each serving size is separate.(iii) If the cannabis product cannot be easily and permanently scored into individual servings it shall be packaged in a single-serving size.(3) Regulated cannabis shall be labeled and placed in a resealable, child-resistant package prior to delivery to or sale at a cannabis store.20250HB1200PN1641 - 120 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Packages and labels may not display images, illustrations, objects or other artwork attractive to minors, including toys, action figures, emojis or cartoon characters, or depict any words, phrases, lyrics or slogans designed or used in any manner to be especially appealing to children, including the use of images, words, phrases, lyrics or slogans indicating or depicting candy or candies, gummies or lollipops.(5) Labels shall include rotating health and safety statements, which shall be affixed to regulated cannabis, designed to inform cannabis consumers of any potential harm to human health which may result from the smoking of cannabis flower or the consumption of cannabis products. Labels shall cover at least one-third of the front or principal face of a product and be in 12-point font.(6) A cannabis product with a high total THC concentration shall include a warning label on the risks of high THC products.(7) Packaging shall be entirely and uniformly one color, and shall not incorporate any information, print, embossing, debossing, graphic or hidden feature, other than labeling required or permitted by the board.(c) Determination of serving size and scoring.--(1) The regulations promulgated and guidance issued by the board shall:(i) Establish the methods and procedures under this section for determining serving sizes for cannabis flower and cannabis products.(ii) Require a nutritional fact panel that incorporates data regarding serving sizes and potency of 20250HB1200PN1641 - 121 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a serving size.(2) Determine which cannabis products can be easily and permanently scored.(3) In no event shall a serving size or individual package of regulated cannabis exceed a personal amount of cannabis.(d) Failure to comply.--In addition to any other penalties under this act, the packaging, sale, marketing, branding, advertising, labeling or possession:(1) Of regulated cannabis by a cannabis cultivator licensee, cannabis processor licensee or cannabis microbusiness not in conformity with this act and regulations adopted and promulgated by the board as provided under this act shall be grounds for the imposition of a fine or the suspension or revocation of the license.(2) Of cannabis paraphernalia or other paraphernalia by a drug paraphernalia permittee not in conformity with this act and regulations adopted and promulgated by the board as provided under this act shall be grounds for the imposition of a fine or the suspension or revocation of the permit.(3) Of cannabis paraphernalia or other paraphernalia by a person not licensed, permitted or authorized under this act commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 801.2. Advertising.(a) General rule.--The board shall adopt and promulgate regulations to govern the advertising of regulated cannabis, cannabis paraphernalia and other paraphernalia.(b) Specific regulations.--The regulations adopted by the board under subsection (a) shall include prohibiting advertising which:20250HB1200PN1641 - 122 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Is false, deceptive or misleading.(2) Promotes or depicts consumption of cannabis flower or cannabis products, including overconsumption.(3) Promotes or depicts consumption of cannabis flower and cannabis products by children or other minors.(4) Is designed in any way to appeal to children or other individuals under 21 years of age.(5) Is within 1,000 feet of the perimeter of a school, school grounds, playground, park, library, arcade facility, recreational center, child-care facility or other place where children congregate or a church, synagogue, mosque or other building used for religious purposes.(6) Is in the form of an unsolicited Internet pop-up.(7) Is on or in a private vehicle or on or in publicly owned or operated property, including a public transit vehicle, public transit shelter, bus stop, taxi stand, transportation waiting area, train station, airport or similar transit-related location.(8) Makes medical claims or promotes the smoking or consumption of regulated cannabis for a medical or wellness purpose.(9) Encourages the use of cannabis because of its intoxicating effect.(10) Is a promotional gift bearing symbol or reference to cannabis or cannabis paraphernalia.(11) Promotes a cannabis product with a high total THC concentration.(c) Marketing strategies.--(1) The board shall promulgate regulations that prohibit all marketing strategies and implementation of marketing 20250HB1200PN1641 - 123 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 strategies, including, but not limited to, marketing strategies involving the branding, packaging, labeling and location of advertisements, which are designed to:(i) appeal to minors and other individuals under 21 years of age;(ii) provide or otherwise disseminate false or misleading information to cannabis consumers; or(iii) promote a cannabis product with a high total THC concentration.(2) The regulations promulgated by the board shall require that:(i) All advertising and marketing accurately and legibly identify a cannabis entity licensee and, if applicable, any other business or entity responsible for the content of the advertising or marketing.(ii) Any broadcast, cable, radio, print, digital communication advertising, social media and outside advertising only be placed where 85% of the audience is reasonably expected to be 21 years of age or older, as determined by reliable, current audience composition data.(d) Permitted practices.--Notwithstanding any provision of this act to the contrary, a cannabis entity may:(1) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii), develop a brand name for use in labeling, signage and other materials.(ii) The use of a medical symbol or image of cannabis flower, cannabis products or cannabis paraphernalia which are appealing to individuals under 21 years of age and colloquial references to cannabis flower, cannabis products or cannabis paraphernalia is 20250HB1200PN1641 - 124 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prohibited and may not be used in the brand name.(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (ii), engage in reasonable advertising practices which are not otherwise prohibited under this act or regulations and which do not jeopardize the public health, welfare or safety of the general public.(ii) The promotion of the diversion of cannabis flower or cannabis product use in individuals under 21 years of age or the promotion of practices inconsistent with the purposes of this act is prohibited.(e) Product warnings.--(1) All advertising shall be accompanied by a product warning, as determined by the board.(2) Advertising created for viewing by the general public shall include health and safety warnings as determined by the board.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Brand name." A name, alone or in conjunction with any other word or phrase, trademark, logo, symbol, motto, recognizable pattern of colors or any other identifiable marker associated with a cannabis entity licensee.Section 802. Product safety protections.(a) Potency limits.--Cannabis flower and cannabis products sold as provided for under this act may not contain more than:(1) 25% total THC for cannabis flower.(2) 200 milligrams total THC for a cannabis concentrate per package.(3) 5 milligrams of total THC per serving and 25 20250HB1200PN1641 - 125 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 milligrams of total THC per package for a cannabis product other than cannabis concentrate.(b) Youth protection.--Cannabis flower and cannabis products may not be processed in a way that appeals or is attractive to a minor. The board shall promulgate regulations governing the prohibitions of cannabis flower or cannabis products appealing to minors, including:(1) flavors;(2) shapes; and(3) likeness to commercially sold food, candy and beverages.(c) Other prohibitions.--Regulated cannabis that is not derived from naturally occurring biologically active chemical constituents or contains artificially derived or synthetic cannabinoids is prohibited.Section 803. Laboratory testing.(a) Cannabis testing permits.--The board shall issue a cannabis testing permit to laboratories that apply and the board deems qualified to test regulated cannabis. The board may not issue a cannabis testing permit to a laboratory affiliated with a cannabis entity or a medical marijuana organization. The board shall require that cannabis be tested once at final harvest and cannabis flower and cannabis product at final processing.(b) Testing required.--The board shall adopt and promulgate regulations and issue guidelines to govern the testing of regulated cannabis by a cannabis testing laboratory, including stability and compliance testing.(c) Laboratory oversight.--The board may:(1) Enter and inspect cannabis testing laboratories.(2) Conduct testing of regulated cannabis on a cannabis 20250HB1200PN1641 - 126 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 store shelf.(3) Require testing and quality assurance procedures to ensure that results are accurately reported.(4) Require a level of accreditation.(5) Require the reporting of test results to the board.(6) Issue fines or revoke a permit for noncompliance or failure to adhere to this act or any regulations or guidance issued by the board.(d) State cannabis testing laboratory.--The board shall establish and maintain a State cannabis testing laboratory. The State cannabis testing laboratory is responsible for:(1) Developing and maintaining a State cannabis testing laboratory reference library that contains cannabis testing methodologies in the areas of:(i) Potency.(ii) Homogeneity.(iii) Detection and quantitation of contaminants.(iv) Solvents.(2) Establishing standard operating procedures for sample collection, preparation and analysis of regulated cannabis by cannabis testing laboratories.(3) Conducting proficiency testing of independent testing laboratories.(4) Remediating problems with independent testing laboratories.(5) Conducting compliance and stability testing on cannabis samples analyzed by cannabis testing laboratories.(6) Conducting auditing testing on regulated cannabis on a cannabis store's shelf.(7) Identifying and detecting the presence and purity of 20250HB1200PN1641 - 127 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabis, alcohol and tobacco in samples or seized contraband in support of the regulatory authority of the board.CHAPTER 9RECORDKEEPING AND INSPECTIONSection 901. Recordkeeping and tracking.(a) Records required.--The board shall require a cannabis entity licensee and cannabis testing laboratory to:(1) Adopt and maintain security, tracking, inventory control, recordkeeping, record retention and surveillance systems relating to all regulated cannabis at every stage of cultivating, processing, transporting, testing and selling regulated cannabis as provided under this act and regulations of the board.(2) Maintain accurate records identifying all current and former employees and contractors, working for or otherwise engaged in activities by for or on behalf of the cannabis entity and cannabis testing laboratory.(3) For the purposes of this chapter, the term "regulated cannabis" shall mean cannabis seeds, cannabis flower and cannabis products cultivated, processed, sold or offered for sale in this Commonwealth as provided for under this act.(b) Maintenance of records.--A cannabis entity licensee and cannabis testing laboratory shall keep and maintain upon the premises of the cannabis entity licensee adequate books and records of all transactions involving the sale of regulated cannabis by the cannabis entity licensee, which shall include, but is not limited to, all information required under this section and by regulation of the board.(c) Retention period.--All books, records and invoices 20250HB1200PN1641 - 128 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 required to be maintained under this section shall be kept for a period of four years and shall be available for inspection by the board or by an authorized employee or agent of the board.Section 902. Inspections.(a) Random inspections.--A cannabis establishment shall be subject to random inspection by the board or a designated employee or agent of the board during normal business hours. In making inspections, the board shall make reasonable accommodations so that ordinary business is not interrupted and safety and security procedures are not compromised.(b) Availability of licensee or employee required.--The person that holds the license or a designated employee or agent of the person shall be available and present for an inspection of the cannabis entity licensee's cannabis establishment.CHAPTER 10PROHIBITIONS AND PENALTIESSUBCHAPTER APUBLIC EMPLOYEE PROHIBITIONSSection 1001. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Executive-level public employee." The term shall include the following:(1) Deputy secretaries of the Commonwealth and the Governor's Office executive staff.(2) An employee of the executive branch whose duties substantially involve licensing or enforcement under this act, who has discretionary power which may affect or 20250HB1200PN1641 - 129 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 influence the outcome of a Commonwealth agency's action or decision or who is involved in the development of regulations or policies relating to a cannabis entity licensee, permittee or other person engaged in a regulated activity under this act. The term shall include an employee with law enforcement authority.(3) An employee of a county or municipality with discretionary powers which may affect or influence the outcome of the county's or municipality's action or decision related to this act or who is involved in the development of law, regulation or policy relating to matters regulated under this act. The term shall include an employee with law enforcement authority.(4) An employee of a department, agency, board, commission, authority or other governmental body not included in paragraph (1), (2) or (3) with discretionary power which may affect or influence the outcome of the governmental body's action or decision related to this act or who is involved in the development of regulation or policy relating to matters regulated under this act. The term shall include an employee with law enforcement authority."Financial interest." Owning or holding, or being deemed to hold, debt or equity securities or other ownership interest or profits interest in a cannabis entity licensee, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act. A financial interest shall not include any debt or equity security or other ownership interest or profits interest which is held or deemed to be held in any of the following:(1) A blind trust over which the executive-level public employee, public official or party officer or immediate 20250HB1200PN1641 - 130 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 family member may not exercise any managerial control or receive income from during the tenure of office and the period under section 1002(a). This paragraph shall apply only to blind trusts established prior to the effective date of this paragraph.(2) Securities that are held in a pension plan, profit-sharing plan, individual retirement account, tax-sheltered annuity, a plan established under section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq.) or any successor provision deferred compensation plan, whether qualified or not qualified under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or any successor provision, or other retirement plan that is:(i) not self-directed by the individual; and(ii) advised by an independent investment adviser who has sole authority to make investment decisions with respect to contributions made by the individual to the plan.(3) A tuition account plan organized and operated under section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 that is not self-directed by the individual.(4) A mutual fund where the interest owned by the mutual fund in a licensed entity does not constitute a controlling interest."Immediate family." A spouse, minor child or unemancipated child."Party officer." A member of a national committee, a chairperson, vice chairperson, secretary, treasurer or counsel of a State committee or member of the executive committee of a State committee, a county chairperson, vice chairperson, 20250HB1200PN1641 - 131 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 counsel, secretary or treasurer of a county committee in which a cannabis entity cannabis establishment is located or a city chairperson, vice chairperson, counsel, secretary or treasurer of a city committee of a city in which a cannabis establishment is located."Public official." The term shall include the following:(1) The Governor, Lieutenant Governor, a member of the Governor's cabinet, State Treasurer, Auditor General and Attorney General of the Commonwealth.(2) A member of the Senate or House of Representatives of the Commonwealth.(3) An individual elected or appointed to any office of a municipality whose duties directly involve a regulated activity.(4) An individual elected or appointed to a department, agency, board, commission, authority or other governmental body not included in paragraph (1), (2) or (3) that directly receives a distribution of revenue under this act.(5) An individual elected or appointed to a department, agency, board, commission, authority, county, municipality or other governmental body not included in paragraph (1), (2) or (3) with discretionary power which may influence or affect the outcome of an action or decision and who is involved in the development of regulation or policy relating to the regulation of cannabis under this act or who is involved in other matters under this act.(6) A member of the Pennsylvania State Police."Regulated cannabis." Cannabis, cannabis flower and cannabis products cultivated, processed, sold or offered for sale in this Commonwealth as provided for under this act.20250HB1200PN1641 - 132 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 1002. Financial and employment interests.(a) Financial interests.--Except as may be provided for the judiciary by rule or order of the Supreme Court, an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member of the employee, official or officer, may not intentionally or knowingly hold a financial interest in a cannabis entity applicant, cannabis entity, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act or in a holding company, affiliate, intermediary or subsidiary while the individual is an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer and for two years following termination of the individual's status as an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer.(b) Employment interests.--Except as may be provided by rule or order of the Supreme Court and except as provided in this act, an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member of the employee, official or officer, may not be employed by a cannabis entity applicant, cannabis entity permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act or by a holding company, affiliate, intermediary or subsidiary, while the individual is an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer and for two years following termination of the individual's status as an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer.(c) Complimentary services prohibited.--(1) An executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member of the employee, official or officer, may not solicit or accept a 20250HB1200PN1641 - 133 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 complimentary service or thing of value from a cannabis entity applicant, cannabis entity, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act or from any affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company, which the executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member of the employee, official or officer, knows or has reason to know is other than a service or discount which is offered to members of the general public in like circumstances.(2) A cannabis entity applicant, cannabis entity, permittee or other person engaged in a regulated activity under this act or any affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company, may not offer or deliver to an executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member of the employee, official or officer, a complimentary service or thing of value from a cannabis entity applicant, cannabis entity, permittee or other person engaged in a regulated activity under this act or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company, that the applicant, cannabis entity licensee, permittee or other person engaged in a regulated activity under this act, or any affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company, knows or has reason to know is other than a service or discount that is offered to members of the general public in like circumstances.(3) As used in this subsection, the term "complimentary service" shall mean a service, product or other item which is provided to an individual at no cost or at a reduced or discounted cost, which is not generally available to the public under similar circumstances without cost or at a 20250HB1200PN1641 - 134 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reduced or discounted cost. Group rates, including convention and government rates, shall be deemed to be generally available to the public.(d) Divestiture.--An executive-level public employee, public official or party officer, or an immediate family member of the employee, official or officer, who holds a financial interest prohibited by this section shall divest the financial interest within three months of the effective date of this subsection. An executive-level public employee, public official, party officer or immediate family member shall have 30 days from the date the individual knew or had reason to know of the violation or 30 days from the date of publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin of the complete list of persons that applied for or held a license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act, whichever occurs earlier, to divest the financial interest. The State Ethics Commission may, for good cause, extend the time period under this subsection.(e) State Ethics Commission.--The State Ethics Commission shall do all of the following:(1) Issue a written determination of whether a person is subject to subsection (a), (b), (c) or (d) upon the written request of the person or any other person that may have liability for an action taken with respect to the person. A person that relies in good faith on a determination made by the State Ethics Commission under this paragraph shall not be subject to any penalty for an action taken if the material facts stated in the request for the determination are correct.(2) Publish a list of all State, county, municipal and other government positions that are considered public 20250HB1200PN1641 - 135 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 official and executive-level public employee. The Office of Administration shall assist the State Ethics Commission in the development of the list, which shall be transmitted to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin biennially and posted on the board's publicly accessible Internet website. Upon request, each public official shall have a duty to provide the State Ethics Commission with adequate information to accurately develop and maintain the list. The State Ethics Commission may impose a civil penalty under 65 Pa.C.S. § 1109(f) (relating to penalties) upon any individual, including any public official or executive-level public employee, who fails to cooperate with the State Ethics Commission under this subsection. A person that relies in good faith on the list published by the State Ethics Commission shall not be subject to any penalty for a violation of this section.Section 1003. Additional restrictions.(a) Restrictions.--Employees of the board, department, Department of Agriculture, Department of Health or Office of Attorney General, or members or employees of the Pennsylvania State Police whose duties substantially involve licensing or enforcement, the development of laws or the development or adoption of regulations or policy related to the regulation of cannabis as provided under this act or who has other discretionary authority which may affect or influence the outcome of an action, proceeding or decision under this act may not do any of the following:(1) Accept employment with or be retained by a cannabis entity applicant, cannabis entity, permittee or other person 20250HB1200PN1641 - 136 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company for a period of two years after the termination of employment.(2) Appear before the board in a hearing or proceeding or participate in any other activity on behalf of an applicant or cannabis entity licensee, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company for a period of two years after termination of employment. Nothing in this paragraph shall prevent a current or former employee of the department, Department of Agriculture, Department of Health or Office of Attorney General, or a member or employee of the Pennsylvania State Police from appearing before the board in a proceeding or hearing as a witness or testifying as to any fact or information.(3) As a condition of employment, potential employees of the board, department, Department of Agriculture, Department of Health and Office of Attorney General and members or employees of the Pennsylvania State Police shall sign an affidavit that the individual will not accept employment with or be retained by a cannabis entity applicant, cannabis entity, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company for a period of two years after the termination of employment.(b) Employment or retention.--A cannabis entity applicant, cannabis entity, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act or an affiliate, 20250HB1200PN1641 - 137 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intermediary, subsidiary or holding company may not employ or retain an individual subject to subsection (a) until the expiration of the period required in subsection (a)(1). A cannabis entity applicant, cannabis entity, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act or an affiliate, intermediary, subsidiary or holding company that knowingly employs or retains an individual in violation of this subsection shall terminate the employment of the individual and be subject to administrative sanction by the board.(c) Violation.--If an individual subject to subsection (a) refuses or otherwise fails to sign an affidavit as a condition of employment under subsection (a)(3), the individual's potential employer shall rescind the offer of employment.(d) Code of conduct.--The department, Department of Agriculture, Department of Health, Office of Attorney General and Pennsylvania State Police each shall adopt a comprehensive code of conduct which shall supplement all other requirements under this act and 65 Pa.C.S. Pt. II (relating to accountability), as applicable, and shall provide guidelines applicable to the following to avoid any perceived or actual conflict of interest and to promote public confidence in the integrity and impartiality related to the regulation of cannabis as provided under this act:(1) Employees and independent contractors of the department, Department of Agriculture and Department of Health.(2) Members, employees and independent contractors of the Pennsylvania State Police and employees and independent contractors of the Office of Attorney General whose duties substantially involve licensing or enforcement, the 20250HB1200PN1641 - 138 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 development of laws or the development or adoption of regulations or policy related to the regulation of cannabis under this act or who have other discretionary authority which may affect the outcome of an action, proceeding or decision under this act.(3) The immediate families of employees and independent contractors of the department, members, employees and independent contractors of the Pennsylvania State Police and employees and independent contractors of the Department of Agriculture, Department of Health and Office of Attorney General.(e) State Ethics Commission and agencies.--(1) The State Ethics Commission shall do all of the following:(i) Issue a written determination of whether an individual is subject to subsection (a)(1) upon the written request of the individual or the individual's employer or potential employer.(ii) Transmit to the board a list of all positions within the board, department, Department of Agriculture, Office of Attorney General and Pennsylvania State Police whose duties would subject the individual applying for or holding the positions to subsection (a)(1). The board shall post on the board's publicly accessible Internet website and to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The State Ethics Commission shall post the list on the commission's publicly accessible Internet website.(2) The board, department, Department of Agriculture, 20250HB1200PN1641 - 139 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Department of Health, Office of Attorney General and Pennsylvania State Police shall each assist the State Ethics Commission in the development of the list under paragraph (1)(ii). Upon request by the State Ethics Commission, members and employees of the Pennsylvania State Police and employees of the department, Department of Agriculture, Department of Health and Office of Attorney General shall have a duty to provide the State Ethics Commission with adequate information to accurately develop and maintain the list. The State Ethics Commission may impose a civil penalty under 65 Pa.C.S. § 1109(f) (relating to penalties) upon an individual who fails to cooperate with the State Ethics Commission under this paragraph.(3) An individual who relies in good faith on a determination made by the State Ethics Commission under paragraph (1)(i) shall not be subject to any penalty for an action taken if all material facts stated in the request for the determination are correct.(4) An individual who relies in good faith on the list published under paragraph (1)(ii) shall not be subject to any penalty for a violation of subsection (a).SUBCHAPTER BPENALTIES AND IMMUNITIESSection 1004. Administrative sanctions.(a) Authority to impose administrative sanctions.--(1) In addition to any other penalty authorized by law or under this act, the board may impose without limitation the following sanctions upon a cannabis entity, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act:20250HB1200PN1641 - 140 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Suspend, revoke or refuse to renew the license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act of a person convicted of a criminal offense under this act or other law which would otherwise disqualify the person from holding the license, permit or other authorization.(ii) Revoke the license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act of a person determined to have violated this act or regulations promulgated by the board under this act which would otherwise disqualify the person from holding the license, permit or other authorization.(iii) Revoke the license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act of a person for willfully and knowingly violating or attempting to violate an order of the board directed to the person.(iv) Suspend the license, permit or other authorization of a person pending the outcome of a hearing in a case in which the revocation of a license, permit or authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act.(v) Suspend the license of a cannabis entity for violating or attempting to violate this act or regulations promulgated under this act relating to the operation of the cannabis entity cannabis establishment.(vi) Order restitution of money or property unlawfully obtained or retained by a cannabis entity, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act.20250HB1200PN1641 - 141 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (vii) Enter a cease and desist order that specifies the conduct that must be discontinued, altered or implemented by the cannabis entity, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act.(viii) Issue a letter of reprimand or censure, which shall be made a permanent part of the file of the cannabis entity, permittee or other person sanctioned.(ix) Assess administrative fines for a violation of this act or a regulation promulgated under this act, which shall not exceed:(A) $50,000 for each violation of this act or a regulation promulgated by the board under this act by a Category 1 cannabis cultivator licensee or Category 1 cannabis processor licensee or an essential employee or agent of the licensee.(B) $10,000 for each violation of this act or a regulation promulgated by the board under this act by a Category 2 cannabis microcultivator or Category 2 cannabis microprocessor or an essential employee or agent of the licensee.(C) $15,000 for each violation of this act or a regulation promulgated by the board under this act by a cannabis transporter licensee or an essential employee or agent of the licensee.(D) $15,000 for each violation of this act or a regulation promulgated by the board under this act by a cannabis on-site consumption licensee or an essential employee or agent of a licensee.(E) $10,000 for each violation of this act or a 20250HB1200PN1641 - 142 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regulation promulgated by the board under this act by a person that holds a permit to operate a cannabis testing laboratory or by an employee or agent of the licensee.(F) $10,000 for each violation of this act or a regulation promulgated by the board under this act by any other person authorized by the board to engage in a regulated activity under this act.(2) If the board suspends, revokes or refuses to renew a license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act or assesses a fine or civil penalty, orders restitution, enters a cease and desist order or issues a letter of reprimand or censure, the board shall provide the cannabis entity, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act with written notification of the decision, including a statement of the reasons for the decision, by certified mail within five business days of the decision of the board. The cannabis entity licensee, permittee or other person shall have the right to appeal the decision under 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).(3) In addition to a fine imposed under this act or regulations promulgated under this act, the board shall impose an administrative penalty of three times the amount of the license fee, permit fee, authorization fee, tax or any other assessment which is evaded and not paid, collected or paid over. A cannabis entity licensee, permittee or other person subject to a penalty under this paragraph shall have 20250HB1200PN1641 - 143 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the right to appeal the impositions under 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A and 7 Subch. A.(4) Utilize the courts to take all appropriate action to enjoin conduct the board determines necessary to maintain the integrity of the cannabis industry and the health, safety and welfare of the citizens of this Commonwealth, seek and obtain judgment, issue cease and desist orders and request opinions from the Attorney General pursuant to the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act.(b) Aiding and abetting.--A person that aids, abets, counsels, commands, induces, procures or causes another person to violate this act shall be subject to all sanctions and penalties, both civil and criminal, provided under this act.(c) Continuing offenses.--A violation of this act that is determined to be an offense of a continuing nature shall be deemed to be a separate offense on each event or day during which the violation occurs. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to preclude the commission of multiple violations of this act in any one day that establish offenses consisting of separate and distinct acts or violations of this act or regulations promulgated under this act.(d) Property subject to seizure, confiscation, destruction or forfeiture.--Equipment, devices or apparatus', including a point-of-sale system, transaction scan devices, weight or measures, computers, including computer hardware, software and associated equipment, supplies, materials, cannabis proceeds or substituted proceeds, money or real or personal property used, obtained or received or any attempt to use, obtain or receive equipment, devices or apparatus', supplies, materials, cannabis 20250HB1200PN1641 - 144 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 proceeds or substituted proceeds, money or real or personal property of a cannabis entity, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity in violation of this act shall be subject to 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 5803 (relating to asset forfeiture), 5805 (relating to forfeiture procedure), 5806 (relating to motion for return of property), 5807 (relating to restrictions on use), 5807.1 (relating to prohibition on adoptive seizures) and 5808 (relating to exceptions).(e) Sanctions.--(1) In considering appropriate administrative sanctions against a person for a violation of this act, the board shall consider all of the following:(i) The risk to the public and to the integrity of the Commonwealth's regulated cannabis industry created by the conduct of the person.(ii) The seriousness of the conduct of the person and whether the conduct was purposeful and with knowledge that the conduct was in contravention of this act or regulations promulgated by the board under this act.(iii) Any justification for the conduct by the person.(iv) The prior history of the cannabis entity, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act involved with respect to the regulated activity, which resulted in the sanction.(v) The corrective action taken by the cannabis entity, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act to prevent future misconduct of the same or a similar nature from 20250HB1200PN1641 - 145 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 reoccurring.(vi) In the case of a monetary penalty, the amount of the penalty in relation to the severity of the misconduct and the financial means of the cannabis entity, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity to pay the penalty. The board may impose a schedule or terms of payment of the penalty as the board may deem appropriate.(2) It shall not be a defense to a sanction before the board that a person inadvertently, unintentionally or unknowingly violated this act. The factors under paragraph (1) shall only extend to the degree of the penalty to be imposed by the board and not to a finding of a violation.(f) Regulations.--The board shall promulgate regulations to effectuate the provisions of this section.Section 1005. Civil and criminal penalties.(a) Violations of this chapter.--An individual who violates Chapter 10 commits a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $10,000 or to imprisonment for not more than five years, or both.(b) Violations of Chapter 11.--(1) A person that fails to timely remit to the department or the State Treasurer amounts required under Chapter 11 shall be liable, in addition to any liability imposed elsewhere under this act or which may be imposed under the Tax Reform Code of 1971, for a penalty of 5% per month up to a maximum of 25% of the amount ultimately found to be due and payable, to be recovered by the Department of Revenue.(2) A person that violates section 1102 shall be subject 20250HB1200PN1641 - 146 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the criminal penalties under the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 1006. General immunities and presumptions.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in this act or regulation of the board adopted and promulgated under this act, in matters related to the regulation of cannabis under this act, the following apply:(1) A cannabis entity, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act shall not be subject to any of the following for engaging in a regulated activity in a manner authorized under this act and any rules or regulations promulgated under this act related to the acquisition, possession, cultivation, processing, storage, transporting, testing, transfer and selling of regulated cannabis or cannabis paraphernalia:(i) Prosecution.(ii) Search, seizure or inspection, except by the board, bureau, Department of Agriculture, Department of Health, Pennsylvania State Police or local law enforcement as provided under this act.(iii) Penalty in any manner, including, but not limited to, civil penalty.(iv) Denial of any right or privilege.(v) Except as provided in section 1009, administrative sanction or disciplinary action by a licensing board of the Commonwealth or any other Commonwealth agency.(2) An agent, employee or other person employed or contracted by a cannabis entity shall not be subject to any of the following for working for or contracting with a 20250HB1200PN1641 - 147 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cannabis entity licensee as provided under this act and any rules or regulations promulgated by the board under this act:(i) Prosecution.(ii) Search.(iii) Except as provided in this act, a penalty in any manner, including, but not limited to, a civil penalty.(iv) Denial of any right or privilege.(v) Disciplinary action by a licensing board of the Commonwealth or any other Commonwealth agency.(b) Seizures and forfeitures.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, any regulated cannabis, cannabis paraphernalia, legal property or interest in legal property that is owned, leased, possessed or otherwise utilized in connection with the use of regulated cannabis as authorized under this act, or acts incidental to that utilization or use, may not be seized or forfeited. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent the seizure or forfeiture of regulated cannabis exceeding the amounts authorized under this act or to prevent seizure or forfeiture if the basis for the seizure or forfeiture is unrelated to the regulated cannabis that is possessed, transferred, transported or used as provided under this act. Nothing in this subsection shall prevent the board from seizing regulated cannabis or cannabis paraphernalia.CHAPTER 11TAXES AND TAX ADMINISTRATIONSection 1101. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:20250HB1200PN1641 - 148 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Regulated cannabis." Cannabis seeds, cannabis flower and cannabis products sold and purchased as provided under this act.Section 1102. Cannabis excise tax.(a) Imposition.--An excise tax is imposed at the rate of 12% of the cannabis store sales price for regulated cannabis sold by cannabis stores. Except as otherwise provided by regulation, a product subject to the tax imposed under this subsection may not be bundled in a single transaction with a product or service that is not subject to the tax imposed under this subsection.(b) Treatment.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, cannabis paraphernalia sold by a cannabis store or a cannabis paraphernalia permittee is a taxable sale under and subject to the provisions of section 202 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(c) Deposit.--All money received from the tax imposed under subsection (a) shall be deposited into the Cannabis Revenue Fund.(d) Information required by department.--A cannabis paraphernalia permittee subject to the tax imposed under this section shall provide the department with all documents, materials, books and records and any other information required by the department under Chapter VIII of Part VI of Article II of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(e) Application.--An on-site consumption licensee shall not be subject to the excise tax imposed under this section for regulated cannabis sales to consumers at its on-site consumption premises.Section 1103. Authority and duties of department.20250HB1200PN1641 - 149 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Authority of department.--The department shall:(1) In collaboration with the board, administer and collect taxes imposed under this act and interest imposed under section 806 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.(2) Promulgate and enforce rules and regulations to carry out the department's prescribed duties as provided under this chapter, including the collection of taxes, penalties and interest imposed by this act and to prescribe the extent, if any, to which rules and regulations relating to taxing shall be applied without retroactive effect.(3) Prescribe the forms and the system of accounting and recordkeeping to be used by cannabis entity licensees, permittees and other persons engaged in a regulated activity under this act to carry out the department's duties under this chapter.(b) Powers and duties of department.--(1) The department, for the purpose of audit and examination, shall, at all times, have the power of access to all books, records, documents, materials, devices and equipment, including, but not limited to, point-of-sale systems, transaction scan devices, weights and measures and computer software, hardware and associated electronic equipment and any other equipment or devices maintained and used by a cannabis entity licensee, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act and related to all aspects of cannabis operations, which are kept, maintained or otherwise used by a cannabis entity licensee, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act.20250HB1200PN1641 - 150 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Notwithstanding section 353(f) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, the department shall supply the board, the Pennsylvania State Police and the Office of Attorney General with information concerning the status of delinquent taxes owed by the applicant, licensee, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act.(c) Regulatory authority.--To promptly carry out the department's powers and duties under this act, the department may adopt and promulgate temporary regulations in the same manner in which the board is authorized to adopt and promulgate temporary regulations.Section 1103.1. Municipal tax on on-site consumption licensees.(a) Imposition of sales tax.--A municipality may impose a sales tax at the rate of 3% of the sales price for regulated cannabis sold to consumers by an on-site consumption license located within the municipality.(b) Deposit of sales tax proceeds.--All money received from the tax imposed under subsection (a) shall be collected and retained by the municipality.Section 1104. Liens and suits for taxes.(a) Liens for taxes.--Unpaid taxes imposed under section 1102 shall be subject to section 1401 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.(b) Suits for taxes.--All taxes imposed under this act that are unpaid or delinquent shall be subject to section 243 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.(c) Municipal taxes and liens.--Unpaid taxes under section 1104 shall be subject to the act of May 16, 1923 (P.L. 207, No. 20250HB1200PN1641 - 151 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 153), known as the Municipal Claim and Tax Lien Law.Section 1105. Tax deduction allowed.(a) Ineligible persons.--A tax deduction shall be allowed from the taxable income of a cannabis entity in the amount of the ordinary and necessary expenses paid or incurred during the taxable year by the cannabis entity which are ordinarily deductible for Federal income tax purposes under 26 U.S.C. § 162 (relating to trade or business expenses). The deduction shall only be permitted to the extent deductions for expenses under 26 U.S.C. § 162 were not taken by the cannabis entity for Federal income tax purposes for the taxable year.(b) Tax violations.--(1) In addition to any other provision of this act governing the issuance of a license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act, the board, upon notification by the Department of Revenue, shall refuse the issuance or renewal of a license, permit or other authorization to a person for any of the following violations of this act or the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971:(i) Failure to file a tax return.(ii) Filing a fraudulent return.(iii) Failure to pay all or part of a tax or penalty finally determined to be due and payable.(iv) Failure to keep books, records, materials or other information or documents required by the Department of Revenue.(v) Failure to secure and display licensure.(vi) Willful violation of any rule or regulation of the Department of Revenue or the board related to the 20250HB1200PN1641 - 152 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administration and enforcement of tax liability.(2) (i) Upon notification from the Department of Revenue that a violation under paragraph (1) has been corrected or resolved, the board shall notify the cannabis entity applicant, cannabis entity, permittee or other person authorized to engage in a regulated activity under this act that the violation has been corrected or resolved.(ii) Upon receiving notice from the Department of Revenue under subparagraph (i), the board may issue or renew the license, permit or other authorization to engage in a regulated activity under this act or vacate an order of suspension or revocation.CHAPTER 12REVENUESection 1201. Cannabis Revenue Fund.(a) Establishment of fund.--The Cannabis Revenue Fund is established as a separate fund in the State Treasury.(b) Deposits into fund.--The fund shall consist of proceeds from the sale of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia from cannabis stores, from licensing fees collected by the board, money collected by the Department of Revenue for taxes under this act, money appropriated to the board and the Department of Revenue for implementing, administering and enforcing this act and other money, grants, gifts, donations or contributions from any other source which may be made to the fund.(c) Distributions from the fund.--Money in the fund shall be distributed for the following:(1) Actual and necessary costs incurred by the board for 20250HB1200PN1641 - 153 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 implementing, administering and enforcing this act.(2) Actual and necessary costs incurred by the Department of Revenue for carrying out duties under this act.(3) Actual and necessary costs incurred by the Department of Agriculture and the Department of Community and Economic Development in carrying out powers and duties under this act.(4) Reasonable and necessary costs incurred by the Office of Social and Economic Equity.(5) Actual and necessary costs incurred by the Pennsylvania State Police and the Office of Attorney General to carry out duties under this act.(6) Actual and necessary costs incurred by the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts to carry out the requirements under Chapter 3.(7) After the distributions of money under paragraphs (1), (2), (3), (4), (5) and (6), money remaining in the fund deposited during the prior fiscal year shall be distributed as follows:(i) 50% of the money remaining in the fund shall be deposited into the Communities Reimagined and Reinvestment Restricted Account established under section 1202 and shall be used for the purposes provided in section 1202.(ii) 10% of the money shall be deposited into the Substance Use Disorder Prevention, Treatment and Education Account established under section 1203 and used for the purposes enumerated under section 1203.(iii) 5% of the money shall be deposited into the Cannabis Business Development Fund.20250HB1200PN1641 - 154 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) 2.5% of the money shall be appropriated to the Pennsylvania Minority Business Development Authority to provide noncannabis related business loans for individuals that meet the qualifications of a social and economic equity applicant. (v) 2% of the money shall be appropriated to the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts to provide grants to counties based on the number of cases to be vacated or expunged within the county.(vi) Money remaining in the fund after disbursement under this paragraph shall be deposited into the General Fund.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Fund." The Cannabis Revenue Fund established under subsection (a).Section 1202. Communities Reimagined and Reinvestment Restricted Account.(a) Establishment.--The Communities Reimagined and Reinvestment Restricted Account is established as a restricted account within the Cannabis Revenue Fund.(b) Deposits into account.--Each fiscal year, the State Treasurer, after consultation with the Secretary of the Budget, shall transfer into the account the money received under section 1201(c)(6)(i). Money deposited into the account along with money which may be appropriated by the General Assembly or which may be otherwise contributed, donated or received from any other source, including the Federal Government, for the purposes of this section.20250HB1200PN1641 - 155 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Administration of account.--The account shall be administered and governed by the office of social equity, in consultation with the Department of Community and Economic Development.(d) Advisory committee established.--(1) An advisory committee is established to recommend grantees in eligible historically impacted communities and other identified communities.(2) The members of the advisory committee shall include: (i) The director of the Office of Social Equity.(ii) Four appointments made by the General Assembly as follows:(A) One individual appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate who shall have knowledge and experience in building healthy communities, including social, economic and health equity in underserved communities in this Commonwealth.(B) One individual appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate who shall have knowledge and experience in building healthy communities, including social, economic and health equity in underserved communities in this Commonwealth.(C) One individual appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives who shall have knowledge and experience in building healthy communities, including social, economic and health equity in underserved communities in this Commonwealth.(D) One individual appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives who shall have knowledge and experience in building healthy 20250HB1200PN1641 - 156 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 communities, including social, economic and health equity in underserved communities in this Commonwealth.(iii) Seven members appointed by the Governor as follows:(A) Four representatives of community-based providers or community development organizations in historically impacted communities or other identified communities with expertise in job placement, homelessness and housing, legal assistance, behavioral health, substance use disorder treatment and effective rehabilitative treatment for adults and juveniles.(B) One expert on assessing and addressing the impacts of Federal and State drug policies on underserved communities.(C) Two individuals who were previously incarcerated for an act that is now lawful under this act.(3) The following, or their designees, shall serve as ex officio members:(i) the Attorney General;(ii) the director of the Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency;(iii) the Commissioner of Pennsylvania State Police;(iv) the Secretary of Drug and Alcohol Programs;(v) the Secretary of Human Services;(vi) the Secretary of Labor and Industry;(vii) the Secretary of Community and Economic Development; and20250HB1200PN1641 - 157 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (viii) the Secretary of Health.(e) Membership considerations.--(1) To the extent possible, individuals shall be appointed in a manner to achieve a balanced and diverse representation of the geographic regions and demographics, including age, race, ethnicity and gender, of this Commonwealth.(2) In determining membership for the advisory board the following apply:(i) Within the five years immediately preceding the date of appointment, the appointee and a member of the appointee's immediate family shall not have done any of the following:(A) Been appointed to, been elected to or been a candidate for Federal or State office.(B) Served as an officer, employee or paid consultant of a political party or the campaign committee of a candidate for elective Federal or State office.(C) Served as an elected or appointed member of a political party central committee.(D) Been a registered Federal, State or local lobbyist.(E) Served as a paid congressional or legislative staffer.(F) Contributed $2,000 or more to a congressional, State or local candidate for elective public office in any year. The following apply:(I) The amount under this subparagraph shall be adjusted every 10 years by the cumulative 20250HB1200PN1641 - 158 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) for the Pennsylvania, New Jersey, Delaware and Maryland area for the 10 most-recent 12-month periods for which figures have been officially reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics immediately prior to the date the adjustment is due to take effect.(II) The authority shall transmit notice of any change to the amount under this subparagraph to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(ii) Staff and consultants to, persons employed by or under a contract with and any person with an immediate family relationship with a member of the Congress of the United States, the Governor or a member of the General Assembly shall not be eligible for appointment to the board.(iii) As used in this subsection, the term "immediate family" consists of other individuals with whom the individual has a bona fide relationship established through blood or legal relation, including parents, children, siblings or in-laws.(f) Term limits.--Members appointed under subsection (d)(2)(ii) shall serve for a term of three years, and may only serve a total of two terms. Members appointed under subsection (d)(2)(iii), (iv) and (v) shall serve for a term of two years and may only serve a total of two terms.(g) Quorum.-- a majority of members shall constitute a quorum.20250HB1200PN1641 - 159 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (h) Chair.--the director of the Office of Social Equity shall serve as chair.(i) Neglect of responsibility.--A member of the advisory board may be removed by a majority vote of the board for substantial neglect of duty, inability to discharge the powers and duties of office, violation of subsection (d), gross misconduct or conviction of a felony.(j) Purpose of advisory committee.--In order to address social, racial, health, criminal justice and economic disparities as a result of past Federal and State drug policies, the advisory committee is established to:(1) Address the impact of economic disinvestment, environmental discrimination, violence and the historical overuse and discriminatory nature of criminal justice responses in historically impacted communities and other identified communities by providing resources to support local design and control of community-based activities and programs to help alleviate the impacts.(2) Engage with impacted communities and stakeholders to develop a reinvestment strategy using science and data.(3) Recommend programs designed to improve the health, wellness and economic justice for populations and communities harmed by Federal and State drug policies through investments in sectors including economic development, employment infrastructure, access to affordable housing, public recreation spaces, legal services, violence prevention, mental and behavioral health.(4) Promote economic development, employment infrastructure and capacity building related to the social determinants of health in historically impacted communities 20250HB1200PN1641 - 160 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and other areas determined eligible to participate in the programs under this section.(k) Other identified communities.--In addition to historically impacted communities, the advisory board may recommend communities affected by Federal and State drug policies that may be eligible for grants. The Office of Social and Economic Equity shall make publicly available the analysis and identification of communities in this Commonwealth adopted by the Office of Social and Economic Equity as eligible for a grant under paragraph (1). Eligible areas shall be redetermined every four years.(l) Community partnerships.--The advisory committee shall develop collaborative partnerships within identified historically impacted communities and other areas designated by the advisory committee.(m) Duties of office and committee.--The Office of Social and Economic Equity, in consultation with the advisory committee and the Department of Community and Economic Development shall:(1) Develop a process to solicit applications from persons, groups and organizations eligible for a grant. Groups and organizations eligible for grant awards under this section shall include, but not be limited to: (i) Community-based providers.(ii) Community and economic development organizations.(iii) Groups and organizations concerned with criminal justice diversion.(iv) Groups and organizations engaged in reentry support, employment training and employment opportunities for individuals returning from incarceration.20250HB1200PN1641 - 161 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (v) Groups and organizations engaged in youth development, family and child welfare activities.(vi) Experts in the field of violence reduction.(vii) Groups and organizations that provide free or discounted legal services to indigent individuals.(viii) Certified Economic Development Organizations. (ix) A municipality, as long as municipality does not use the grant funds to supplant any funding that otherwise would be appropriated for preexisting programs.(x) Other organizations, groups, providers and experts determined by the advisory committee as being essential to the mission and purposes of the advisory committee.(2) Develop standard uniform templates for planning and implementation activities to be submitted by grant applicants and awardees to the advisory committee.(3) Identify resources sufficient to support the full administration and evaluation of Communities Reimagined and Reinvestment programs, including building and sustaining core program capacity at the community and State levels.(4) Facilitate the provision of training and technical assistance for capacity building for persons, groups and organizations within and among historically impacted communities and other communities identified as eligible areas.(5) Review grant applications and approve the distribution of grant money.(6) Develop a performance measurement system that focuses on positive outcomes, identifies negative results and provides recommendations for improvement.20250HB1200PN1641 - 162 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) Develop a process to support ongoing monitoring and evaluation of groups and organizations that were awarded a grant.(n) Use of money in account.--The money deposited into the account shall be administered by the office and allocated by the office of social equity to:(1) Provide grants for the purpose of reinvesting in historically impacted communities or other identified communities. Grants shall be used to support:(i) Job placement, job skills services and adult education.(ii) Mental health and behavioral health treatment, including posttraumatic stress disorder.(iii) Substance use disorder treatment.(iv) Housing.(v) Financial literacy and community banking.(vi) Nutrition services.(vii) Services to address adverse childhood experiences.(viii) Afterschool and child care services.(ix) System navigation services.(x) Legal services to address barriers to reentry, including, but not limited to, providing representation and related assistance with expungement, vacatur, housing, substitution and resentencing of cannabis-related convictions.(xi) Linkages to medical care, evidence-based women's health services, including maternal health, and other community-based supportive services.(2) Award grants to further support the social and 20250HB1200PN1641 - 163 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 economic equity activities created under this act.(o) Prohibition.--Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the fund and money in the fund shall not be subject to transfer or any other fiscal or budgetary maneuver which would transfer or appropriate money in the fund into any other fund, account or Commonwealth program funded through the State Treasury or by any other Commonwealth agency or which may be established by the General Assembly.(p) Reports.--On or before March 1 of the second calendar year following the effective date of this subsection, and each March 1 thereafter, the office shall submit a report to the Governor and the General Assembly on the office's activities under this section. The report shall detail how the money in the account was distributed and utilized during the preceding calendar year. The report shall include:(1) The amount of money available and disbursed from the account.(2) The procedure used to award grant funds from the account.(3) The names of the grant recipients, including the business address and other identifying information the office determines necessary and appropriate.(4) The dollar amount awarded to each grant recipient.(5) The purposes for which the grant was awarded to each recipient.(6) A summary financial plan for money in the fund, which shall include estimates of all receipts and all disbursements for the current and succeeding fiscal years and the actual results from the prior fiscal year.(q) Nonlapsing of money.--Amounts remaining in the account 20250HB1200PN1641 - 164 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse and shall remain in the account and used for the purposes enumerated in subsection (d).(r) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Communities Reimagined and Reinvestment Restricted Account established under subsection (a).Section 1203. Substance Use Disorder Prevention, Treatment and Education Restricted Account.(a) Establishment of account.--The Substance Use Disorder Prevention, Treatment and Education Restricted Account is established as a restricted account within the Cannabis Revenue Fund which shall be administered by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs.(b) Deposits into account.--(1) Each fiscal year, the State Treasurer, after consultation with the Secretary of the Budget, shall transfer the money received under section 1201(c)(6)(ii) into the account.(2) Money appropriated by the General Assembly to the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs(3) Money contributed, donated or received from any other source, including the Federal Government.(c) Use of money in account.--The money in the account appropriated to the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall be used for the following purposes:(1) To develop and implement a youth-focused public health education and prevention campaign, including school-based prevention, early intervention and health care services 20250HB1200PN1641 - 165 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and programs, to reduce the risk of cannabis and other substance use by school-age children from kindergarten to grade 12.(2) To develop and implement a Statewide public health campaign focused on the health effects of cannabis and legal use, including an ongoing education and prevention campaign that educates the general public, including parents, consumers and retailers, on the legal use of cannabis, the importance of preventing youth access, the importance of safe storage, preventing secondhand cannabis smoke exposure, information for pregnant or breastfeeding women, the risks of cannabis products with a high total THC concentration and the overconsumption of cannabis flower and cannabis products.(3) To provide substance use disorder treatment programs for youth and adults, with an emphasis on programs that are culturally and gender competent, trauma-informed, evidence-based and provide a continuum of care that includes screening and assessment, including substance use disorder assessment, as well as mental health and behavioral health assessment, early intervention, active treatment, family involvement, case management, overdose prevention, prevention of communicable diseases related to substance use, relapse management for substance use and other co-occurring behavioral health disorders, vocational services, literacy services, parenting classes, family therapy and counseling services, medication-assisted treatments, psychiatric medication, psychotherapy and mindfulness programs.(4) To provide community-based peer recovery support services.(5) To evaluate the programs being funded under this 20250HB1200PN1641 - 166 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section to determine the programs' effectiveness.(d) Reports.--(1) On or before March 31 of the second calendar year following the initial transfer of money from the account under this section, and each March 31 thereafter, the Secretary of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall compile and submit a report detailing how money in the account was utilized during the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include the following:(i) The amount of money disbursed from the account and the award process used by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs to make disbursements.(ii) The recipients of money from the account.(iii) The amount awarded to each recipient.(iv) The purposes for which the awards were granted, including a description of programs and services provided by each recipient.(v) A description or summary of positive outcomes resulting from programs and activities implemented by grant recipients.(vi) A summary financial plan for the money awarded, which shall include estimates of all receipts and all disbursements for the current and succeeding fiscal years and the actual results from the prior fiscal year.(2) The report shall be submitted in paper form or electronically to:(i) The Governor.(ii) The Majority Leader of the Senate.(iii) The Majority Leader of the House of Representatives20250HB1200PN1641 - 167 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) The Minority Leader of the Senate.(v) The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(e) Prohibition.--Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the account and money in the account shall not be subject to transfer or any other fiscal or budgetary maneuver which would transfer or appropriate money in the account into any other fund, account or Commonwealth program funded through the State Treasury or by any other Commonwealth agency or which may be established by the General Assembly.(f) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Substance Use Disorder Prevention, Treatment and Education Restricted Account established under subsection (a).Section 1204. Prohibition.Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, money in the Cannabis Revenue Fund may not be subject to transfer or any other fiscal or budgetary maneuver which would transfer or appropriate money in the fund or account into any other fund, account or Commonwealth program funded through the State Treasury or by any other Commonwealth agency or which may be established by the General Assembly.CHAPTER 13BONDSSection 1301. Bond issuance.(a) Issuance.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the board shall establish a program to issue bonds for the following purposes:20250HB1200PN1641 - 168 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Funding to open cannabis stores, hire employees and the any other purpose necessary to commence the sale of cannabis seeds, cannabis flower, cannabis products and cannabis paraphernalia as permitted under this act.(2) Initial funding for the Cannabis Business Development Fund.(b) Debt or liability.--(1) Bonds shall not be a debt or liability of the board or the Commonwealth and shall not create or constitute any indebtedness, liability or obligation of the board or the Commonwealth.(2) Bond obligations shall be payable solely from revenues or money pledged or available for repayment as authorized under this chapter.(3) Each bond shall contain on the bond's face a statement with all of the following information:(i) The bonds are limited obligations of the board.(ii) The board is obligated to pay the principal of or interest on the bonds only from the revenues or funds pledged or available for repayment as authorized under this chapter.(iii) The full faith and credit of the Commonwealth is not pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds.Section 1302. Bond limitations.(a) Limitation.--The board may issue bonds in an aggregate principal amount not to exceed $100,000,000. The board shall determine the principal amounts of taxable and tax-exempt bonds to be issued under this section. The board shall, in its discretion, determine if one bond or multiple bonds will be 20250HB1200PN1641 - 169 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 issued at one time or from time to time and in one or more issues, series or classes.(b) Debt service.--The board shall annually notify the Governor and the chair and minority chair of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chair and minority chair of Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives of the debt service payment due on bonds issued under this chapter. Annual debt service for bonds shall be paid from proceeds of Article II of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 1303. Deposit of bond proceeds.The Cannabis Bond Account is established in the State Treasury. Except as otherwise provided for in any contract with the bondholders, all appropriations and payments deposited into the Cannabis Bond Account are appropriated on a continuing basis to the board to be used solely for the purposes listed under section 1301. The net proceeds of any bond issued under this chapter, money received from repayments of principal on loans from the Cannabis Bond Account, payments of interest, other fees and charges with respect to refinances made under this chapter and insurance premiums and charges assessed and collected by the board on loans made from the Cannabis Bond Account shall be deposited into the Cannabis Bond Account.CHAPTER 21MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 2101. Duties of Department of Agriculture.The following shall apply:(1) In addition to other obligations of the Department of Agriculture as provided under this act, the Department of Agriculture shall collaborate with the board to develop 20250HB1200PN1641 - 170 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 standards and best practices related to the following:(i) The cultivation of cannabis as a value-added agricultural crop.(ii) Cultivation methods, including, but not limited to, indoor and outdoor cultivation of cannabis, such as hydroponic and aeroponic cultivation, and other methods for growing and cultivating cannabis.(iii) Production protocols, including pest management and the use of insecticides, pesticides, herbicides, fertilizers and other chemicals in crop production.(iv) Criteria which may be used to determine when cannabis products may be deemed adulterated or misbranded. In developing criteria, the board and the Department of Agriculture may base a determination on the factors under 3 Pa.C.S. §§ 5728 (relating to adulteration of food) and 5729 (relating to misbranding of food).(v) Nutrient and waste management.(vi) Ethical and environmentally friendly agricultural practices related to the cultivation of cannabis.(vii) Forming and maintaining a cooperative agricultural association by cannabis entities.(viii) Other agricultural best practices used in agricultural operations related to crop production.(2) (Reserved).Section 2102. Cooperation.Each department, agency, office, authority, board, commission or similar governmental entity under the jurisdiction of the Governor shall cooperate with the board to support the 20250HB1200PN1641 - 171 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 implementation of this act.Section 2103. Public health report.(a) Report required.--Beginning January 1 of the even year at least one year after the effective date of this subsection, and biennially thereafter, the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs, in consultation with the Department of Health and the board, shall issue a report to the General Assembly on the public health effects of cannabis. The report shall include, but shall not be limited to:(1) General use patterns and trends.(2) Accidental ingestion of products by young children.(3) Secondhand smoke concerns.(4) Substance misuse and concerning public health trends.(5) Youth cannabis use and prevention.(6) Recommendations to prevent and reduce concerning public health trends.(b) Publication.--The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall submit a copy of the report of the affairs of the board to the the chair and minority chair of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate, the chair and minority chair of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives and the chair and minority chair of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives. The Auditor General shall post the annual audit of the affairs of the board to its publicly accessible website.Section 2104. Repeals.Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeals under paragraph (2) are necessary to effectuate this act.20250HB1200PN1641 - 172 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The following acts and parts of acts are repealed to the extent specified:(i) Section 13(a)(30) and (31) of the Controlled Substance Act are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act for conduct when the controlled substance is cannabis and no probable cause exists to believe that the conduct alleged is punishable by a mandatory minimum term of imprisonment or subject to a sentence enhancement.(ii) Section 13(a)(32), (33) and (34) of the Controlled Substance Act are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act for conduct when the controlled substance is cannabis.(3) All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 2105. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following sections shall take effect 90 days after the specific date noticed by the board under section 405(b)(1) for the commencement of sales in cannabis stores:section 202(2), (3) and (4);section 202.1;section 205; andsection 2104(2)(i).(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1200PN1641 - 173 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526